Authors
Stephen Graham Jones
Number of Reviews
56

Title
Review for Bats (1999/I)
In Cujo there was one bat, and a handful of people died. Now imagine there
are thousands of bats. Net result? Even more people die. But now of course
the bats are digital, and--in close-up--bear some serious family resemblance
to the little 'demons' in The Gate. Which is part of the fun: horror is far
and away the most self-referential of the genres. It has to be. If it
doesn't conscientiously acknowledge its precursors, we assume that it's
presuming to exist in a vacuum, to be not derivative in spite of a horror
section that sprawls over half the video store. It's about respect, and Bats
dutifully shows it, even going so far as to place Nosferatu on the marquee
and work it into the background over and over.
As for the story, it's comfortably familiar: Mad Scientist being punished
for hubris, for tampering with nature, for doing to some bats what the
scientists in Deep Blue Sea did to their sharks--making them into killing
machines, then 'accidentally' releasing them. Next of course you have to
assemble the crew, gather all the specialists (Lake Placid, etc), see how
they function together, all that. And of course a staple of all this is that
the Mad Scientist doesn't want his creation killed, in spite of the fact
that it so obviously needs to be killed. None of this is new. Neither is the
role of Sheriff Kimsey (Lou Diamond Phillips), the token authority figure
who quickly becomes central to everything. Ben Affleck in Phantoms, Roy
Scheider in Jaws, the list goes on.
More or less, Bats is an airborne Arachnophobia, even down to the 'Typhoid
Mary' spider/bat, who has to die in a final grudge match in order for the
bats/spiders to be 'really' beaten. Or, looking at it from the
vampire-angle,
the head vampire has to die, be it at the hands of Corey Haim and Co. or
Sheriff Kimsey and his ragtag crew: bat-guru Sheila Caspar (Dina Meyer; and
yes, 'Caspar,' this close to Halloween) and her comical side-kick Jimmy
(Leon), who single-handedly provides half the fun of Bats.
The other half is of course the bats (Chiroptera) themselves, that
Gremlin-like supply of bats. The same bats who are both driven to kill by
hunger and rarely bother to stop and eat any of their victims. But so be it.
Those victims do tend to die fairly graphically, and that's what we really
want, after all. So far, all of this meets the admittedly low criterions
Bats sets for itself. But then it goes a little far, (guilty of hubris
itself, yes) tries to draw from one source too many: Outbreak. Yes, the
'virus' these bats are carrying will soon paint most of a computer
simulation of North America red. Meaning Kimsey and Co. aren't just trying
to save their small corner of the world (from the bats and the military),
but the world itself. Which does a lot to defeat the isolation which is so
vital to horror. They even have radio and modem uplinks to the outside
world, and thus are able to order supplies, when what would work better is
to see them defeat the bats all by themselves. That's the kind of stuff that
reinforces our sense of self-worth, as if we might have done the same thing,
given the same circumstances. Still, however, and in spite of all the
outside help, properly killing all these bats isn't quite a cakewalk,
although we know all along it's more or less an inevitability. The question
is just how, and, even if Bats doesn't hide that quite as well as, say,
Mimic does, it still manages to satisfy. It is the season for bats, after
all. We can forgive the small things, so long as the none of the conventions
are ignored. Bats, comprehensively derivative as it is, ignores not a single
one.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
In the summers that aren't Bond-summers, we get the Bond-movies without
Bond. Which is to say gadget movies, all the high-tech toys and
death-defying leaps that'll fit into 2 hrs. Entrapment is all of this and
more: it even has the original Bond--Sean Connery--playing high-stakes cat
thief Mac. More or less the same veteran criminal-type role he had for The
Rock, except this time he's starring opposite Catherine Zeta-Jones,
insurance agent (Gin Baker), high-altitude acrobat, sharp dresser. The
Bond-girl has to be all of this and more.
Gin Baker is, and then some. But too, she has a day job, or, more
specifically, an assignment: to gain Mac's confidence via assuming the role
of fellow-thief, then turn him in. In a nutshell, this is Entrapment (and
Donnie Brasco, and countless more). Granted, the technical difficulty-level
of the robberies Mac and Gin attempt together does escalate, which is
satisfying, and their relationship does flirt with intimacy, which is
necessary, but, as the title suggests, that's not really what it's all going
to be about. What it is all about is entrapment, defined in the trailer as
what the law does to the unlawful. And whether honor among thieves applies
or not. And who's entrapping whom in the first place. Ving Rhames is even in
there somewhere, waltzing through his Mission Impossible role again. To
director Jon Amiel's credit, though, he does keep us guessing until the
final frames (via occlusion, which isn't quite fair, but so it goes), when
everyone takes their double-agent masks off and bears their collective
souls. Which is to say he never quite lets Entrapment get lost in its own
gadgetry.
Instead, he does another version of the same sleight-of-hand Raiders of the
Lost Ark pulled off once and for all: he not only legitimizes the thief, he
glorifies the thief. The thing is, if we don't have sympathy for the main
character, if we don't want Indiana Jones to get away with the golden idol
(and thus 'preserve' it), then the rest of the movie tends to fall apart.
And there's many ways of legitimizing the theif. Absolute Power does it by
essentially cleansing the (similarly) aging criminal's crime, making it
petty in comparison to the crime he witnesses. Which creates a hierarchy of
criminal acts, which succeeds in making the thief less a thief. Entrapment
goes about it differently. What Mac steals is largely modern art, which the
'modern' world doesn't assign that much value in the first place. So,
suddenly, petty larceny's the name of the game; nobody's starving as a
result of Mac's crime habit. Add to this the fact that he's not stealing it
to resell, but to ornament his Highlander- esque castle, and he's either a
lonely gentleman addicted to the thrill of the game or a particularly
debonair bachelor in need of interior decoration, either of which are
forgivable.
Where Entrapment breaks away from tradition--at least the Bond-type
tradition--is that the narrative finally isn't hinged upon one final stunt
that outdoes all previous stunts, but upon a man and a woman alone in a
train station. This isn't The Jackal or The Saint, with little epilogues
tacked on as an afterthought. Here, the epilogue is the final stunt. While
that may not quite satisfy those who actually expect such developments in a
movie, it does set Entrapment slightly above the usual Bond-replacement,
which, in a Bond-less summer, might just be enough.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
In Speilberg's Always, the dead hang around for awhile, tying up the loose
ends of their lives. In Jacob's Ladder, the dead hang around in a similar
manner, having to make peace before they can move on. Ditto with
Beetlejuice, High Plains Drifter, Ghost, etc. It's all about preparation. In
that regard the The Sixth Sense is no different. There's even a brilliant
little thematic moment where a red balloon is released in a staircase. It
climbs, climbs, rising steadily away from the party, and then finally comes
to rest against the ceiling, unable to go any higher. Yet. It's no accident
either that director/writer M. Night Shyamalan has the young Cole (Haley
Joel Osment) be the only one aware of this balloon. He can, after all, see
the dead, who are similarly trapped.
But of course he doesn't tell people this. Until child psychologist Malcolm
(pay-attention-to-the-name) Crowe (Bruce Willis) enters his life. The deal
with Crowe is that he feels he once failed to reach a similarly tortured
patient, and his failure led to the tragedy which the movie opens with: that
former patient breaking into Crowe's home for some impromptu therapy. The
Sixth Sense is set a year after that tragic session, but Crowe is hardly
over it. During that year of ostensible convalescence--both psychological
and physical--his marriage has fallen quietly apart, to the point where he
and his wife no longer talk. If he can only help this Cole, maybe everything
will be all right again.
So for Crowe, it's about redemption.
For Cole, however, it's about making it down the hall to the bathroom at
night, an acute terror we feel with him, although at that point there's yet
to be anything supernatural on-screen. But when it comes, hold on. Remember
about 45 minutes into Exorcist III, where an unannounced nun with some
cadaver tool floats silently across the hall, in the background? One of the
single scariest moments in moviedom, for the simple reason that, 45 minutes
into it, the tension level is so high that the slightest thing can release
it all at once. M. Night Shyamalan understands this thoroughly, and handles
his 'manifestations' with a steady hand. He never crowds a room with them,
but chooses instead to simply reflect them in a child's reaction shots. It's
not so much that they're out of the frame, though, as with The Blair Witch
Project. It's that they're locked into Cole's point-of-view, thus
inaccessible, or, only accessible when dramatically effective, which drains
a little off the illusion of reality any horror film depends upon. In
Shyamalan's defense, though, perhaps he delayed putting Cole's 'sixth sense'
on-screen simply because he wants us to know the viewer before the viewed.
Otherwise Cole might get upstaged.
All minor issues aside though, what stands out is how Shyamalan leads us to
believe that the dramatic line is lifted directly from Good Will Hunting:
the therapist and the patient both depending on each other for a cure. And
in a sense this is the dramatic line, but in the final moments, in what's
already looking like a typical Hollywood epilogue, it's recast in an
unconventional light. One that makes you reconcieve the whole movie, much as
Arlington Road did. Much as Jacob's Ladder did. The real surprise, though,
is that The Sixth Sense owes more to Always than to Jacob's Ladder. The
dual-epiphanies Cole and Crowe eventually achieve--tying together subplots
which seemed incidental but were in fact pivotal--make you appreciate the
darkened theater. People can't see your eyes without lights. But then
they're misty too: The Sixth Sense is a horror movie with an unexpected love
story embedded in it. Prepare.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
The cultural anthropologists suggest we play violent sports because--in a
more or less peaceful society--we have no other socially-condoned outlet for
our aggression(s). But not everyone boxes on the week-ends. Some just go see
movies like David Fincher's Fight Club, which, as with Natural Born Killers,
gives us vicarious access without the sweat, blood, and legal repercussions.
And it is over-the-top, lookaway violent. And,
surprise surprise, it's not just Bloodsport or Lionheart or Mortal Kombat.
Which is to say there's actually some real storytelling going on. Ten
minutes in you think you can predict it, which is comfortable, but then it
spins out of control, becomes unpredictable, and suddenly you're no longer
in the Bloodsport-genre.
It is, however, a very controlled spin, incessantly voiced-over by
our Narrator, 'Jack,' (Edward Norton), a Wonder Years approach which serves
to turn Fight Club into his monologue. What he's doing is catching us up
with story of his 'fall,' which is to say he's reconstructing that story for
us, which gives him gives him freedom to play fast and loose not only with
sequence but with the perceived reality of the movie. Yes, there are a few
Woody Allen-ish (Ferris Bueller-ish) talking-into-the-camera meta-moments,
but, to Fight Club's credit, they are entertaining, and do occasionally
provide a chunk of narrative exposition that would have otherwise required
some serious contrivance to introduce. So, the meta-moments are economical,
but just barely.
But back to 'Jack' our insomniac, stuck in an office job, defining
himself by his mail-order furniture, hoping for a break in the monotony of
consumer-existence. Sum: he prays for a plane crash, and instead his
apartment is blown up, which is to say he's reborn in flames, he can rise
Phoenix-like from the ashes of his former life and move on. All of which
sounds over-the-top melodramatic, but it's in keeping with the tone of the
rest of the movie. Now enter Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt, in another 12 Monkeys
counter-establishment role), dressed like Dennis Rodman, the
complete inverse of everything 'Jack' claims to be. Where 'Jack' is
leading an inauthentic existence, Tyler is the real thing. He's the answer
to the question 'Jack' can never quite articulate, that he's been looking
for in cancer-support groups.
Now he doesn't need those support groups anymore, though. He
has Tyler, his Dean Moriarty, and, soon enough, the underground
phenomenon called Fight Club, which satisfies his/their need for the
authentic, via defining fighting (pain) as self-knowledge. And
self-knowledge is of course the generic simile for the authentic. And, as
they find out, their need for the authentic in a commercially constructed
world is epidemic: Fight Club spreads like wildfire. Across the nation,
even. But then, at its height, it morphs into Tyler's idea of controlled
demolition, something called Project Mayhem, which is all about anarchy,
bringing down the establishment, starting America over, better this time.
Which is the point at which this all becomes untrivial for 'Jack.' It
was supposed to just be something like therapy for him (in the unlikely
guise of Ultimate Fighting), but now it's no longer about him. And,
predictably, there's even a damsel-in-distress he needs to save: Marla
Singer (Helena Bonham Carter, no longer Ophelia), fellow 12-step junky. And,
in addition, there's even one big secret about Fight Club, almost of the
calibre of the secret The Crying Game tried to keep, or Sixth Sense. Think
Jekyl and Hyde, or even comedy, The Man With Two Brains. Or, specifically,
Lost Highway. Fight Club does, after all, have the that same
hyper-reality of the dreamstate. And it does open in the dendritic spaces of
'Jack's internal organs, a nervescape Three Kings has already acquainted us
with. Suffice it to say that whereas the first part of the movie is about
needing a Tyler Durden and the middle part is about living with a Tyler
Durden, the last part is all about fighting Tyler Durden, trying to save the
girl, trying to save the commercial America his prior self was so dependent
upon.
And yes, there are some weak re-cap moments in those last 15
minutes--Fincher trying to rationalize the big secret--and some stuff so
over-the-top that it redefines Fight Club as 'fantastic,' but fantastic
isn't all bad. And here, it even serves a purpose, manages to follow through
on what we didn't realize at the time was foreshadowing: just as Tyler
Durden's Fight Club morphed into Project Mayhem, so does 'Jack's Fight Club
morph into something like a modern-day fable. And fables have morals,
messages. So does Fight Club. Watch, listen, don't let the
violence make you look way. It's worth every blood-slinging moment.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
The first question to ask of a two and a half-plus hour movie is could it
have been shorter and still achieved the same effect? With a Heat, yes; with
The Insider, no. The next question then is was that effect worth two and a
half-plus hours, which is a little trickier to answer, as you have to first
establish what the movie was trying to do. The Insider pretends to make that
part easy for us, though: just as the TV magazine newshow 60 Minutes
exposes, say, the tobacco industry, so does director Michael Mann's The
Insider pull the curtain back on 60 minutes. Which is to say if your
infortainment fetish didn't get satiated during prime time, check out the
local theatre. It's all on the big screen now, dramatized. With big name
actors: Al Pacino as a convincing Lowell Bergman, 60 Minutes
segment-producer; Christopher Plummer as an austere, unredoubtable Mike
Wallace; Russell Crowe as "insider" Jeffrey Wigand, constantly breathing in
big just to blow the whistle on the tobacco industry.
Too, though, The Insider's something of a fairy tale--the ultimate insider
pairing up with the ultimate investigative journalist to fight tobacco, the
ultimate big industry heavy. Rain Maker-Civil Action type stuff, just
without the Grisham underdog element. 60 Minutes is 60 Minutes, after all.
Their calls get returned. As for Bergman and Wigand, too, they're
practically the same character: one clings to journalistic ethics in the
face of everything, and the other is a steadfast scientific method man. And
both want to right all the wrongs so obviously going on, no matter the havoc
it wreaks on their personal lives. The first part of being a hero, after
all, is cutting all your ties or having them cut for you. Watch all the
Deathwishes for more like this.
Of course there are various obstacles in Wigand and Bergman's way, though,
which gives us the dramatic structure of The Insider: first Wigand goes to
bat for Bergman, then Bergman goes to bat for Wigand. The problem with all
this, though, is that the in-house resistance Bergman has to eventually
hurdle (CBS translated as 'Corporate BS,' as personified in Gina Gershon) is
much more believable than the resistance Wigand has to deal with. Not that
we don't all already 'know' that big tobacco wouldn't hesitate to threaten
the life of a whistle blower. That can be assumed. It's the threats
themselves which don't ring true, or, feel suspiciously as if they've been
edited for TV, so to speak. Which is to say the names have been left
intentionally vague in order to avoid any potential legal ramifications.
Which is to say that The Insider feels as if it's falling prey to the same
pressures that--in the movie--are trying to keep Wigand off-camera.
Yes, though, one objection to that would be that the parties intimidating
Wigand and family were never formally revealed, indicted, whatever, meaning
The Insider, like 60 Minutes, is being true to the facts. Which is fine,
except that The Insider claims to be a 'dramatization.' And dramatizations
are pretty much licensed to do whatever's necessary to make the facts
narratively compelling. And there are times in The Insider when things
simply aren't that compelling, when bladder issues become more important
than what's going on on-screen. But so be it. Russell Crowe is excellent; Al
Pacino is doing a lighter version of his Glengarry Glen Ross role. And
nevermind that the big 'secret' the trailer uses to draw us into the theater
is anticlimactic enough that Mann had to spill it early rather than string
us along (which is some good foresight on his part). Is The Insider worth
the two and half-plus hours it takes to get through it without a pause
button, though? Yes, but only for that one "How about Mr. Wallace?" line,
which we've already heard.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Scream 3 (2000)
Scream 3 -- the final cut: slash and learn
The third installment of any horror movie franchise is itself something of a
zombie--a dead thing being forced to walk around, a re-animated corpse, just
shuffling through the motions of life, pretending that the story which
drives it is still vital, isn't just the first installment in a different
setting, with a different cast and better effects. All the same, though,
that third installment can't veer too far from what made the original
successful. It is a franchise by now, after all; there has to recognizable
features, characteristic 'franchise' traits. So it is with Wes Craven's
Scream 3. Here we have Kevin Williamson's glib hip characters, all too aware
of how intertextual their ongoing predicament is yet unable to get out of
it, either. Next there's the trademark Ghostface slasher, who doesn't lumber
around like Jason or change shapes like Freddy, but instead skulks about at
high-speed, gets kicked a lot (a touch of verisimilitude for the doubters),
and--most importantly--doesn't reveal his or her identity until the final
frames, Scooby-Doo style. Thus everyone's a suspect, just as in Scream and
Scream 2 , which fosters a tense, skeptical environment lightened time and
again with comedy. Just when you think you know who the killer is, bam, that
person dies gruesomely, someone makes a good joke about it, and then you're
moving on, trying to deduce Ghostface's identity by elimination, if nothing
else.
This is Sidney's (Nev Campbell) predicament: having to figure out who
Ghostface is. Unlike the first two installments, though, this time she isn't
in a sexually-charged, socio-academic setting, surrounding by friends who
don't yet know they're fodder. Now she's done the Laurie Strode shtick, and
isolated herself--insulated herself--taken an outpost in the woods, where
she can see the bad guys coming from a long ways off (she hopes). The bad
thing is, though, Ghostface saw H2O too, and is doing the Michael Myers
thing, tracking her down, killing people to extract her location.
Specifically, killing all the people involved with the making of "Stab 3,"
the movie-within-the movie which acts as commentary upon Scream 3 itself.
Which is nice, yes, but too, familiar territory for Wes Craven. This is how
he tried to inject new life into the Nightmare series (New Nightmare), after
all, and, though it wasn't quite effective there, it does work here, if for
no other reason than that it allows the Scream-formula to play itself out
element by element, using as its excuse that it's modeled on the movie, and
the movie itself was modeled on that initial event--which, for us, was the
original Scream. Too, having all these sound-stages within sound-stages
allows for some serious walk-ons: Parker Posey, Jenny McCarthy, Lance
Henrikson, Patrick Dempsey, Carrie Fisher, Patrick Warburton (Seinfeld's
Puddy), and, last but not least, Kevin Smith's Silent Bob and Jay. Add to
this the usual suspects--'survivors' Courteney Cox, David Arquette, and Nev
Campbell (as the heroin/e the horror audience is addicted to)--and Scream 3
has quite a retinue, each more killable than the last.
The big question with it, though, is does it still have enough juice, is it
as powerful as the first installment? Because we all know that second, while
decent, kind of lost it at the end, or, rather, when everyone was unmasked,
it became apparent that we couldn't really have guessed it. Which insures
the ending will be a surprise, yes, but does so with obfuscation instead of
misdirection. And misdirection is what made the original Scream so good.
Too, in talking about the third as compared to the first two, you have to
take into account that to both be as original as the original and still
remain 'faithful' to the original is a near-impossible task. That first
Scream fundamentally changed commercial horror, by introducing some
genre-awareness, and that same genre-awareness is what carried the second as
well. All that meta-talk about the conventions of the sequel. Scream 3
continues the tradition, even resuscitating Randy (Jamie Kennedy) on
videotape long enough for him to explain the trilogy they're in, how, as the
trailer says, all bets are off.
And he's rights--the rules of the first two no longer hold. Scream 3 even
goes so far as to hint at the 'real' supernatural (Sid's dead mom), which is
perhaps it's one weak point. Well, one of two. The other is that, though you
can't say for certain who Ghostface is going to be this time, you can
nevertheless intuit who it's going to be in relation to the main characters,
which is as specific as I can be without spilling many beans. That Scream 3
can still have still have beans to spill this late in the game is something
of a feat, though, especially when it's kept itself to a minimum of
contrivance. Most horror-series are just going through the motions by the
third installment, troping around, playing the zombie, which is to say
acting tired. Scream 3, however, shows few signs of fatigue. Maybe even a
little reinvigoration, of all things, in the face of claims that, with the
advent (success) of Blair Witch and Sixth Sense, the tennybopper slasher pic
has run its course, is now making way for more mature horror, more cerebral
horror, horror which reintroduces the supernatural which Scream and Phantoms
disallowed. Lest we forget, though, horror is fundamentally about being
young and scared, the 'safe' thrill of it all. However, if the naysayers are
right, and Scream 3 is the last of its kind for a while, then the slasher
pic couldn't have had a better send-off. Or, rather, send-up, which may have
been Williamson's goal all along: by wearing the generic conventions on its
sleeve throughout the trilogy, the Scream franchise pretty much insured
that--even without Blair Witch and Sixth Sense--it would be the last of its
kind. Any other teenybopper slasher pic which doesn't acknowledge those
conventions and then do something with them will quite simply pale in
comparison (e.g., I Know What You Did Last Summer, etc), be an insult to the
audience of Randys Scream's cultured, who are already three steps ahead and
grinning wide.
(c) Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Double Jeopardy (1999)
Part of the appeal of cinema/narrative is the space between the scenes, the
B we have to fill in to get from A to C. It's about economy, allows more to
be said with less words. Simple stuff. Language is similarly streamlined,
and can be streamlined as such because both speaker and listener know the
codes, or, in cinema again, the conventions. We're native to the medium, so
to speak. The trick for the movie-maker, now, is to say the most in the
least amount of time, which means make the B-spaces as wide as possible
without losing the audience. And there's so many ways to lose the audience.
Simple confusion is one ('C? What, how'd we get here already?'). At the
other end of the spectrum is director Bruce Beresford's Double Jeopardy,
more or less insulting us by glossing over the past six years (etc) via
putting the explanation for those six years awkwardly in some supporting
character's mouth. Meaning that character is no longer talking to another
character, as s/he should be, but to us, for us. And this doesn't happen
just once.
But back to the beginning. Double Jeopardy opens on Libby (Ashley Judd) and
Nick Parsons (Nowhere Man himself, Bruce Greenwood), going through the
motions of a relationship so peachy-keen that it has to take a left turn
somewhere else. As the trailer gives away, it does: soon enough Nick's
'dead,' and, as a result, Libby's rushed through an indictment/trial/
sentencing/imprisonment sequence, all time-compressed to the point that
there's very little substance left to it at all, it just becomes the
obligatory prelude for what was evidently intended to be the real meat of
the movie: the double-jeopardy loophole. But still, it's unforgivable, takes
up a good twenty minutes, which is to say Double Jeopardy takes far too long
to get started.
Once it does, however, it's what we expect in a movie which pairs Tommy Lee
Jones and Ashley Judd: the Fugitive meets Kiss the Girls--Tommy Lee all
about compassion, duty, Ashley Judd all about resolve, determination. And of
course they both play their respective roles as well as can be expected, and
are great on-screen together. The problem with Double Jeopardy isn't with
them, but with the writing, or rather, the lack of writing. When Double
Jeopardy isn't skipping heedlessly from moment to moment (A to C),
neverminding causality, it's putting Libby in some Rocky-ish workout
sequence. Or having her make an early promise to a child about how the movie
will end. And of course these promises to children are never broken. Which
does a lot to not surprise us with the ending.
But so be it. In a movie with this little suspense, we tend to look to the
stunts for gratification (see: Fair Game). David Weisberg and Douglas Cook
did get writing credit for The Rock, after all (while Beresford directed
another prison movie, Last Dance...), which had all kinds of explosives. The
thing is, though, aside from a couple of car catastrophes, Double Jeopardy
falls short on the action-end as well. Or rather, it does with it what it
does with the first twenty minutes: skips over all the good parts. On the
upside, there is a cool James-Bond-ish New Orleans funeral, which is even
capped by Nick not killing Libby, but leaving her to die, Spectre-fashion.
Maybe it's an in-joke. Or, maybe the whole movie's a joke, one of those
where the concept (of double-jeopardy as plot device) preceded the script,
but financed it nevertheless.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
Bringing Out the Dead: night and the city
In movies about surveillance--say, End of Violence, Enemy of the
State--the question quickly becomes Who watches the watchers.
Similarly, with crooked cop shows (Bad Lieutenant, among others), the
question takes the form of Who enforces the law for the enforcers. It makes
sense then that Martin Scorsese's Bringing Out the Dead, a movie about
paramedics, would have as its central question Who saves the 'savers.' But
if it were that simple, it wouldn't be much of a movie, so Scorsese
problematizes it, makes these paramedics hardly worth saving.
These are guys who cruise the streets looking for people to beat up, guys
who, through drinking and driving and a whole host of other infractions,
routinely endanger the safety of the people they're supposed to care about.
All of which is probably supposed to supply us with the generic definition
of a complex character(s): one who both doesn't value human life and fights
tooth and nail for that human life.
Of these 'complex' characters (John Goodman, Ving Rhames, Tom Sizemore),
Frank Pierce (Nicolas Cage) emerges as the most significant, the one most in
need of saving. This simply because he's a junky, addicted to the rush of
saving lives. And it's been so long since he's saved anyone. And, in
addition, he's haunted by the (projected) presence of Rose, a young girl who
died on him, whom he feels especially guilty for not saving. Of course, too,
he tries to ignore her through gin and intravenous cocktails and getting
lost in the job, but nothing works; she remains. And it's slowly pushing him
over the edge. And everyone's dying on him. And he's got an interior
monologue going on just in case we don't pick up on all this.
Enter Mary Burke (Patricia Arquette), someone who, unlike Pierce
and the rest of the paramedics, still has some kindness in her. Brings
people water when they need water. All of which suggests maybe she can save
him. He did resuscitate her cardiac-arrested father with some well-placed
Sinatra music, after all, so she does 'owe' him. Too, though, her father
might have been better off dead, might in fact have wanted to be dead, and
Pierce knows this, and as a result they (Pierce and Burke) just bounce off
each other at odd times through the movie, as if their scenes are really
only there to allow our eyes a rest from all the city
lights constantly streaking by (see: overkill).
Does Pierce get 'saved,' though? It's hard to tell. Or, rather, it's
hard to care, as Bringing out the Dead, while ostensibly 'about' him, is
really more about the paramedic existence as focused through him. All the
whacked-out people, the blood, someone always screaming 'stat' in the
background. With the right editing, Bringing Out the Dead could have even
made a good mock-documentary on HBO. Too, it could have been developed more
in the direction it already leans towards--the vampire genre: all these guys
feeding off the dead and dying, the daylight lasting
about fifteen seconds, all that fun stuff. As it is, though, it's just a
visual ride that goes nowhere. And the bad thing is, look away for five
seconds and it's over. The good thing is you don't really miss it. Or, don't
feel you missed out on anything.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
A good eighty-percent of science fiction in the movies owes everything to
horror. Yes, Alien was great, but structurally, what's the real difference
in it and, say, Halloween? Event Horizon and Hellraiser? Yet we tend to
privilege sci-fi over such horror, if only the slightest bit, largely
because the emptiness of space allows one thing horror always has to work so
hard for: isolation. Whereas most of the final girls in horror could just up
and leave town, get themselves out of danger, (if they weren't morally
obliged to stop Jason, etc) Ripley's forever stuck on that ship. To leave is
to die, whereas to stay is to at least have a chance. Meaning her staying
on-board doesn't require any suspension of disbelief, as it often does in
horror, where you're often tempted to talk to the screen, tell these
characters to just leave already. Ripley can't. Supernova is no different
here. It's essentially a horror movie set in space, albeit a horror movie
with James Spader, which ups the ante considerably.
Too, instead of opening with a bang, Supernova starts rather thematically,
with a 22nd (or so) century rerun of a Tom & Jerry episode. Initially, it
looks to be just fluff, something we can share with these future humans, a
comical bridge from us to them, which isn't an uncommon device in sci-fi, as
it allows us both to recognize these people and then identify with them. But
director Thomas Lee uses it a little differently. As things unfold, Tom &
Jerry seems to function almost as a comment on the genre, on how ridiculous
it is that Michael Myers (Tom, here) just keeps getting up, no matter how
cleverly he's killed. He's no normal cat, but of the cartoon-variety. The
same goes for the 'bad' guy in Supernova, the more-than-human, Lost
Boys-looking stalker (Peter Facinelli) hellbent on wiping this crew out.
Granted, he does get to talk, unlike Tom, but they're essentially the same
character.
Which means, yes, we need a Jerry. Enter Nick Vanzant, (Spader) recovering
junkie, able pilot, on his first mission with the aptly-named Nightengale,
an interstellar EMT, complete with the (by now generic) surly doctor,
(Angela Basset, looking like Strange Days) token sex-kitten, (Robin Tunney;
even Galaxy Quest had one) disposable captain, lovable programmer, an
android, a female HAL, ('Sweetie") and Yerzy, (Lou Diamond Phillips) who's
strangely showing some grey at first. Don't fret, though; his greyness is
written in, or, better yet, telegraphed. Yes, you can figure it all out a
third of the way into it. But still, it's fun. For one, there's the ship,
which has the coolest way of 'bending' space since Dune, probably. Too,
there's all the Black Hole stuff going on, how the Nightengale gets trapped
in the gravity well of a blue giant, only has so long, etc. And finally,
there's the artifact, which turns out to work much like the sphere in
Sphere, and is just as important to existence as the fifth element was in
Fifth Element.
However. As important as the artifact is made out to be, still, when it's
all said and done and the people who make it out alive have made it out
alive, the universe doesn't really feel saved, mostly because it never
really felt threatened in the first place. Supernova would likely have been
better off keeping the danger local, only putting the crew in jeopardy.
Granted, it makes for a great trailer, but it results in some disappointment
in the theater. Too, it all happens so fast. Not that 90 minutes isn't an
appropriate time for a cerebral action-thriller heavily dependent upon
effects, but it doesn't feel quite long enough for Supernova. Or, rather,
Supernova feels rushed, makes you suspect a lot was left on the editing room
floor, though that likely wasn't the case. In all likelihood, even, the fact
of the matter is that a lot of it was likely left in the pen, when Supernova
was being written, which is too bad for Spader. He's great as usual, but
when it comes right down to the final scene, it's not Vanzant's Jerry-like
cleverness which saves the day, but brute strength. It was a disappointment
in Resurrection, and it's a disappointment here. On the upbeat, though,
Supernova does, in the closing frames, introduce some fluidless sex that
Cronenberg would have been proud of. Perhaps that's why Spader signed on. It
wasn't for the story, anyway.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for 13th Warrior, The (1999)
A work (novel, movie, whatever) only gets the story-behind-the-story
treatment when it's been part of conventional knowledge for so long that the
audience gets all the little in-jokes, can appreciate the asides, the irony,
etc. To look at it another way, a work only gets the story-behind-the-story
treatment when it's been overdeveloped in so many other directions that
burrowing into the myth of its own origins is about all that's left. This is
what Shakespeare in Love does for Romeo and Juliet, what Love and War tries
to do for Farewell to Arms. This is also what the 13th Warrior tries to do
for Beowulf--to tell it from the POV of a minor/forgotten participant in the
'actual' event, of which Beowulf is a loose retelling. The thing is,
however, Shakespeare in Love had the advantage of coming right on the heels
of 199x's Romeo + Juliet, meaning the play was still fresh in our minds, we
were already piqued for a little more iambic pentameter, please. The 13th
Warrior doesn't have such an advantage: disregarding the recent
sci-fiBeowulf (not released in America),there's been nothing to leave us
hungry for Old English, mead, all that.
Writer/director Michael Crichton (along with Diehard's John McTiernan) was
likely aware of this poor timing, too, so, for the big screen, this
adaptation of his historical novel Eaters of the Dead draws more on, say,
the enthematic swordplay of Braveheart, the 'good fight' against-all-odds
feel of Starship Troopers, and, further back, all the Dungeons &
Dragons-type movies (Flesh and Blood(1985), Excaliber, etc.) which also
manage to assemble a rag-tag group into some honorable world-saving
campaign.
In The 13th Warrior, that rag-tag group is composed of twelve Viking
volunteers, plus the initially-reluctant exiled Arabian poet Ibn Fadlan
(Antonio Banderas). The world this group has to save is a village in
Scandinavia. What they have to save the village from are creatures of
legend--eaters of the dead. Which is to say transgressors of one of our most
fundamental taboos: cannibalism. And, when fighting cannibals, you're
automatically the good guy, which is how Crichton manages to erase any
raping and pillaging Eric the Viking-type associations, making the
campaigners honorable. In addition, though--or, to really establish the bad
guys' inhumanity--the bad guys are never really personified, which makes Ibn
Fadlen and Co.'s series of skirmishes with them impersonal, as it would be
with a mass of animals. And this isn't necessarily a weakness, but more of
an identification trick: the bad guys are as dark and mysterious to us as
they are to Ibn Fadlan and Co. It does have a flipside, though: when the
battle gets pared down to the individual level, it doesn't have that same
finality you get with, say, Conan and Thulsa-Doom. Meaning we're not sure
it's over when it is, in fact, over.
If that was the only flaw, The 13th Warrior could possibly be a great movie.
But there's more. There's the castle-intrigue in the opening sequence, which
establishes so little that it's never mentioned again. There's Ibn Fadlan's
love interest in the village they're saving, which feels tacked on. There's
Antonio Banderas playing a devout Muslim. There's some unwisely foregrounded
translation difficulty (Old English to Latin, then Latin to Arabian, which
is cinematically rendered in English, etc) which slows things down
considerably. On the plus side, though, there is a lot of flashy AD&D-type
sword and horseplay, there's an ancient woman who talks with Yoda-syntax
('Seek you me?'), and there's even something of a transformation in Ibn
Fadlan, which allows him to put pen to paper again, write that epic. More
than all that, though, what The 13th Warrior leaves you with is a distinct
nostalgia, not for a period in history that's lost, but for a period in
history that never really was, at least as it's presented on-screen. Which
is to say it does get us to buy its illusion, if only for a while.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Stir of Echoes (1999)
Take Chinatown as the archetypical detective movie. In it a private
investigator has to reconstruct some crime bit by bit. And the crime of
course happened before the movie started. And everyone tries to steer him
off the case. And it all gets real personal real fast, to the point where
the detective's need to know is held in balance against his need to live.
These conventional developments we expect from a hard-boiled detective
movie. What we don't expect them from so much, though, is horror, which is
part of the appeal of director David Koepp's Stir of Echoes (based on
Richard Matheson's book)--that, although it has dead people walking the
halls, is nevertheless structured after the traditional detective movie,
even down to the opening, where Tom Witzky (Kevin
Bacon)--private-investigator-like--is minding his own business, just trying
to scratch out a decent living, when a 'strange woman' enters and turns his
world inside-out.
Or, specifically, via an overextended Big Lebowski-ish hypnosis session, she
accidentally flips a switch in his psyche, which transforms him into a
'receiver,' which translates into the ability to see dead people walking
around, to catch glimpses of the past, the future, all that. But of course
Witzky never quite sees it all in detail (qua Blink), which is tantalizing
enough to compel him to reconstruct bit by bit whatever 'crime' occurred
before the movie opened. Think Poltergeist; it's the same story with a
tighter cast and better music (or, it's 1996's Spectre with good direction).
And his 'investigation' unfolds conventionally, with all the appropriate
setbacks, distractions, isolations, etc. He even gets some help from his son
(Zachary David Cope), who's a 'natural' receiver, not unlike Haley Joel
Osment from Sixth Sense, though Zachary David Cope is no Haley Joel Osment.
Where Stir of Echoes breaks from the traditional detective movie set-up is
that the 'detective' here actually has a home life--nominally pregnant wife
and prescient son--which serves to heighten what's at stake for him here.
And it is effective in that regard, though at times the rounds of marital
conflict and reconciliation seem a bit forced, more dramatically necessary
than developmentally. This home-life, however, does give Witzky room to
complain that his life is too 'ordinary,' which, in a horror-movie, is
another way of asking for it. Soon enough everything's all but ordinary, and
Witzky only wants to close the Doors of Perception which Jim Morrison wanted
open so badly in The Doors.
And it's easy to understand why he wants them closed: the undead he can see
now are easily the summer's scariest, even moreso than Sixth Sense's, this
due largely to how Koepp renders undead movement--both fast and contained,
as in Jakob's Ladder, which is for some reason primally disturbing. Which is
of course exactly what we pay for--to be scared. In that sense, Stir of
Echoes satisfies, and then some. However. For a while, when the external
pressure Witzky's facing is at low ebb, Stir of Echoes tries to maintain the
tension via the undead doing all the typical haunting things--turning out
lights, standing around every corner, etc, which doesn't fit with how the
undead in the reality of Stir of Echoes are 'supposed' to act. But oh well.
It happens in Romero too, whom Koepp unsubtly references. Aside from that,
and in spite of an ill-advised (see: non-catchy) title, Stir of Echoes is
high-caliber horror, the kind that stays with you a little longer than you
really want it to.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
The Jaws structure works because it's simple: oversized shark enters
isolated community, begins feeding, has a few good kills and chase scenes,
then is in turn chased and killed, largely because the whole meal-thing got
a little too personal somewhere along the way. Man versus nature, intellect
against instinct, all that. Deviate too far and you don't have a shark-movie
anymore. Duncan Kennedy and Wayne Powers were aware of this during writing,
and it shows. Deep Blue Sea is a shark movie, this time set out on a
Waterworld-ish compound, complete even with another anti-social man from
Atlantis, right down to the haircut, sleeveless wetsuit, and underwater
acrobatics: Carter Blake (Thomas Jane) the soon-to-be-redeemed ex-con.
And of course his chums, led by the overworked Samuel Jackson and rounded
out by the beautiful-anywhere Saffron Burrows, playing a female Victor von,
LL Cool J in the mix there somewhere, in another unreprised yet still
entertaining role (see H20). The low point of the movie is everytime his
alcoholic preacher character tries to get metaphysical. The high point is
the sharks: Renny Harlin (Die Hard 2, Cliffhanger, Long Kiss Goodnight )
knows how to put an action sequence together in the computer, and has plenty
of opportunity. Remember the floating cow in Twister? Deep Blue Sea has a
similar moment with the floating leg/twitching foot of a
recently-bitten-in-half crewman. But yes, the structure is Jaws all the way,
what with the waterborne Aquatica compound, the isolating storm, the sharks
fenced in so they can't leave.
Yes, plural sharks. In keeping with Anaconda, Lake Placid, Ghost & the
Darkness (Jaws 3), etc., there's not just one of them anymore. That would be
too easy. And they're makos this time, which have a cooler color scheme
anyway. Needless to say, these sharks are vatgrown, genetically-enhanced,
smart. Pretty much Benchley's Creature without the bothersome legs. We get
the gist of this via some particularly clunky exposition, where Jackson's
Russel Franklin--the cashcow of Aquatica, there to pull the plug unless the
good doctors can convince him otherwise--gets the grand tour.
What perhaps saves Deep Blue Sea from being just another Jaws sequel is the
awareness that this isn't 1975. Not just talking animatronics here, either,
but pop knowledge: we know too much about sharks by now to listen to a
Dreyfuss character wax poetic about feeding habits, rogue behavior, life
cycles, etc. This can all be assumed, and is. In addition, there's enough
environmental guilt circulating that if these sharks weren't essentially
man-made (see: Godzilla) their eventual destruction would be pretty much
unwarranted, (see: King Kong) in spite of the havoc they wreak. What perhaps
doesn't save Deep Blue Sea from being just another Jaws sequel is when it
tries really hard not to be, which is to say when it tries to supplant
Spielberg's underwater POV's we know love and expect with overwater
character history, motivations, revelation, all that small Sphere-type
drama. At least there's no love sub-plot. Just a lot of people getting
ripped apart, which is what we paid to see.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Three Kings opens just as Desert Storm is winding down, but still, manages
to emblemize the whole war in that one opening scene, where the conflict is
pared down to its most ridiculous: the American soldier fighting the Iraqi
soldier for possession of one small little hill (mound) in the middle of the
desert. With an opening like that the movie can only get more ridiculous. It
does. It even gets side-splitting ridiculous at times, via a steady run of
one-liners, but none of it is without purpose. Journalist Adrianna Cruz
(Nora Dunn) sums it all up nicely: "The war is over and I don't know what
the hell it was about." No one seems to, especially the soldiers, our three
(four) 'kings,' whom we meet mid-celebration via the freeze-frame/subtitle
trick (Pulp Fiction, Trainspotting, Lock, Stock & 2 Smoking Barrels, etc)
that's still cool, but just barely. First there's the American soldier from
the opening scene, Troy (Mark Wahlberg), vying for main-characterhood with
Archie (George Clooney), the disillusioned special forces guy. Next there's
Chief (Ice Cube), something of a holy roller qua LL Cool J in Deep Blue Sea,
but a bit more effective. Last there's the wholly uneducated Vig (Spike
Jonze), acolyte of Troy, token Texan.
As the trailer spells out, too, soon enough the four of them get a lead on
Saddam Hussein's stolen gold, and--making the cinematic leap that stealing
from a thief isn't wrong--they set out one hot, final morning to quietly
'recover' it. But of course everything goes wrong, not the least of which is
that their consciences kick in, and they begin to figure out 'why' they're
there after all: to save refugees (i.e., be the Schindlers of the Persian
Gulf). It's no big leap from there to the convention that when the thief in
the movie is both sympathetic and gets the 'loot' early on, then that loot
will have to be traded in for something more lasting. It even happens like
that in Trapped in Paradise, a movie without all the moral clutter of a
morally-dubious war, the kind of war which, in Lethal Weapon, produced
Shadow Company, the bad guys who did essentially the same thing our three
(four) kings are doing in Three Kings.
Nevertheless, though, we know who the good guys are, who the bad guys are.
War movies tend to work like this whether they want to or not. It takes an
especially cool hand like Kubrick's to rise above it (Full Metal Jacket).
Three Kings isn't Kubrick, not quite, although it does have its own brand of
camera/editing work, which, when combined with the sepiatone cinematography
qua the Courage Under Fire flashbacks, manages both to rush everything past
and wash it out in a way we suspect accurately captures the American
soldier's experience. Or, rather, it seems to capture what we imagine the
memory of that experience must be like, which is quite a feat in itself for
director David O. Russell.
But of course this 'thirsty' cinematography could be called Peckinpah, too,
and, with Three Kings, convincingly so, as the story of these four soldiers
is almost uncomfortably similar to The Wild Bunch (Clooney as Holden, etc),
even going so far as to leave the simpleton/hick back to the guard the
prisoners, or, on a larger scale, having the good bad guys get righteous
when it really counts. And then of course too one of their own gets taken
hostage, tortured, all that. At least it strays from the path a little when
Troy--the hostage--has a few bonding-type scenes with his captor, which
writer John Ridley and Russell wisely back out of just as it was starting to
feel Crying Game-ish.
In the end, though--and beneath all the fancy camerawork perhaps meant to
appeal to an audience usually not tuned into social issues--Three Kings is
more or less a social statement: that America was motivated into the Gulf by
greed. In case we miss this, the three (four) kings become aware for us,
when they have to see firsthand the results of that war ('their
actions')--or, when Troy is forced to drink oil, which is a touch
heavy-handed, but so be it. The point gets made, at least. And it's not the
only one: after Wag the Dog, of course the media has to play a role here, in
a war fought on CNN. In this case, however--as with Electric Horsemen--that
role is a redemptive one, which dovetails nicely with the Biblical allegory
operating behind the scenes, ever so quietly. At one point a tanker of milk
even spills out into this Euphrates valley, tempting us to make all kinds of
allegorical connections. Before we can, though, Russell's rushed on to the
next scene, opted to let it all accrete when he could have dwelt on it,
which, like nearly everything else in Three Kings, was the correct decision,
the proper amount of restraint, not the easy way out. It shows. The only
thing missing is the Buffalo Springfield the trailer promised, but it's more
than made up for, simply by the pleasant surprise that the trailer only
covered the first third of the movie. Which is to say there's a lot more to
Three Kings than you go in expecting, but, too, just enough conventional
stuff that you never get lost.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Lake Placid (1999)
In Lake Placid staying alive is easier than you'd think, with a 35 ft.
crocodile prowling the waters. All you have to do is talk: none of the
characters with significant dialogue are killed, though they sorely need to
be. Viewers sometimes bemoan the conventions of the horror- movie--all the
little faux pas you can make that get you dispatched: investigating noises,
having sex, refusing to see the 'truth,' separating yourself from the group,
etc. Just as distressing, though, is when there's no justice at all, when
those genre-taboos are breached and the transgressor doesn't get his or her
desserts. This is Lake Placid, set in King-country, where the ecosystem's
been seriously thrown out of whack by a crocodile big enough to take a
grizzly bear out in one bite. What's a grizzly doing in Maine? It doesn't
matter. There's crocodiles too. The lake isn't even called Lake Placid.
It all starts with the embittered sheriff (Brendan Gleeson) trading quips
with a scuba-geared ecologist, setting the bickering tone for the rest of
the movie. Yes this ecologist dies and dies ugly. Yes, a tooth is recovered
from his corpse which effortlessly attracts another game warden-type (Bill
Pullman), a museum curator running away from a broken relationship in the
city (Bridget Fonda), and one Hector Cyr (Oliver Platt), croc specialist
extrordinaire. The sheriff is already there, grumbling in place, acting as
reluctant guide. Not a bad opening sequence, all in all, and the group
dynamic Steve Miner (everything from Wonder Years to H20) kickstarts is
distracting enough that when the crocodile finally begins snatching the
supporting cast away, it initially catches us off guard. However, this group
dynamic is also what pulls the movie down for the death roll: all the
one-liners incessantly traded back and forth about the city, the country,
the bugs, men women and love, etc, finally just get in the way, or, only
succeed in establishing the movie firmly enough on land that the crocodile,
for all it's technical splendor and appetite for expendable crewmen, is
upstaged.
In addition to these four core characters there's a little old lady who
lives on the lake, makes cooing sounds to herself, and has a soft spot for
the crocodile and a little dab of profanity for everyone else. Typically,
she'd be the token comic foil for the movie, rounding it out, but in Lake
Placid, slapstick is already part of camp life. Brendan Gleeson's sheriff
falls into every crocodile trap Hector Cyr sets. Which isn't their only
point of contention: while the sheriff wants to kill the beast, Cyr wants to
swim with it. It's a mystical thing with him. Soon enough everyone has to
take sides, switch sides, sit on the fence, all that.
Which is to say we're not in the water. Which is to say we never get the
sense that these characters are in any real danger. Who would deliver their
lines if they were dead?
On the plus side, there is an animatronic cow suspended from a helicopter,
as well as a surprise at the big kill scene. Think Anaconda, but don't
accidentally compare the two. In Anaconda people die, suggesting that the
monster might actually win this time. Lake Placid doesn't even flirt with
that. We root for the croc not because of the amount of meat it can grind
per frame, but because, when pitted against the seeming invulnerability of a
good-natured crew in the vital process of bonding, it's the underdog.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
The dilemma for all the 'tin men' in literature/media has always been Do I
have a heart or not? From Oz to Star Trek to director Brad Bird's The Iron
Giant. But The Iron Giant is so much more, too. It opens with a meteor (the
Iron Giant, here) hurtling through space, through Earth's atmosphere, and
landing deadcenter in the eye of what looks to be a hurricane off the coast
of Maine. Which is of course Stephen King country, where anything can
happen. It does
The year is 1957. The place is Rockwell--as in Norman, vintage Americana.
And the boy is Hogarth Hughes (Eli Marienthal), only child of single mom
Annie Hughes (Jennifer Aniston), which is to say he's in bad need either of
an imaginary friend or a father figure. As luck would have it, he gets both
and then some, living out every boy's dream of having his own personal,
Optimus Prime. To complicate things, though--or, rather, to allow
things--this robot (Vin Diesel) has a dent in his head which results in
amnesia, which means Hogarth has to train him (not it), teach him all the
cool stuff John Connor teaches the T1000, not the least of which is that the
soul lives on after the body dies (or, it's bad to kill, but not bad to
die). Which yes is important.
But there are more immediate concerns, too: this robot has to eat. A lot.
And his food of choice is metal. Meaning, in the Maine woods, he has to
venture again and again into populated areas, which eventually attracts the
attention of secret government agency man Kent Mansley (Christopher
McDonald), something of a bungler who is initially made out to be a
lantern-jawed Fox Mulder, but soon reveals himself as the Smoking Man in his
younger, animated days. Meaning Hogarth's giant robot is, to him, all his
Cold War paranoia come frighteningly to life. The robot did land in the eye
of a hurricane, after all, and what are hurricanes if not the turbulent
middle ground of opposing convective forces? It's democracy vs. communism,
writ small in the New England of forty years ago. And yes, soon enough
Mansley has his finger on the button, looking to usher us a little deeper
into the Atomic Age.
Playing opposite Mansley, however, is Beat junkman Dean McCoppin (Harry
Connick, Jr.), who agrees to give Hogarth's robot both room and board
(scrapped cars), and--as we all do--eventually falls for this robot which,
although it's in keeping with how robots were 'supposed' to look in the 50s,
is nevertheless animated as being extremely expressive. It's all about body
language, well-placed grunts. King Kong stuff. And of course his mood-ring
eyes, which only go red (mad) in the presence of guns, which is evidently
his (the robot's) original identity surfacing--an identity he'll need when
the army turns against him, as they have to.
But of course that's never been the question, either--whether the robot
would be villified and then given a chance to redeem himself. The bigger
question has been who will step up as Hogarth's father? Mansley is the
initial choice, but his liberal use of chloroform and nuclear arms kind of
puts him out of the running. Leaving the one who, in the 50s, would never
have qualified: Dean, the Beat. As for how The Iron Giant ends, think Fox
and the Hound. It's pretty much the same story, except, whereas Fox and the
Hound is set in the timeless, nostalgic backwoods of Where the Red Fern
Grows, The Iron Giant has a little more sociohistorical context. That
context has a downside, too, though: in the 50s, the common epithets were
'scout,' 'chief,' etc, which we don't use anymore. But The Iron
Giant--because it is trying to be a period-piece--does. And that use almost
comes off as an endorsement of those terms, even though it is the bad guy
Mansley who uses them. In addition, though there's no outright profanity,
there are a few 'what the hell's,' which perhaps today's children don't even
notice anymore. All in all though, and despite the occasional
irresponsibility, the highest endorsement I can give The Iron Giant is that
I'll buy the video when it comes out, so my son can watch it when he's old
enough.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Bowfinger (1999)
Steve Martin is at his best when his character is trying to sell something
not really worth buying. See his silver-tongued evangelist in Leap of Faith,
a character both reprehensible and sympathetic, the endearing used car
salesman. Eddie Murphy's at his best when allowed to do variations on his
always-one-step-ahead -of-you-and talking-twice-as-fast Axel Foley. In
Bowfinger--written by Steve Martin--both of these actors get to be at their
best: Steve Martin as the title-character--Hollywood outsider/ occasional
filmmaker Bowfinger--and Eddie Murphy as Kit Ramsey, eccentric action star.
And, importantly, they get to be at their best in their own scenes. As with
Dinero and Pacino in Heat, Bowfinger and Kit Ramsey are hardly ever
on-screen together, meaning heavyweights Steve Martin and Eddie Murphy don't
get in each other's way, which gives each whatever creative room they might
need.
Too, though, there's Eddie Murphy's other character, Jiff, the lookalike
stand-in Bowfinger recruits when Kit Ramsey refuses to star in Bowfinger's
picture "Chubby Rain." Jiff isn't a variation on Axel Foley. More a
variation on the Jerry Lewis-type character Eddie Murphy's been playing of
late. Because Jiff isn't Eddie Murphy at his best with Jiff, he and Steve
Martin's Bowfinger can be on-screen together. There's even room for Heather
Graham, Christine Baranski, Jamie Kennedy, Terrence Stamp (not in his The
Hunger persona) some walk-throughs by Robert Downey Jr, etc.
Holding them all together too is a near-brilliant writing job: the premise
of Bowfinger is that if Kit Ramsey won't be in Chubby Rain willingly, then
he'll be in it unwillingly--or, unwittingly, via Bowfinger's cast
approaching him on the street and running lines, all of this surreptitiously
caught on film. If left at this, Bowfinger would be merely clever, but then
Steve Martin takes it one step further, makes Kit Ramsey's 'alien' paranoia
dramatically dovetail with the script for Chubby Rain, which in turn makes
kit Ramsey more and more dependent upon his 'therapist' at MindHead (a
thinly veiled Scientology), which is exactly the kind of domino-action a
comedy needs.
And then there's Frank Oz directing, doing everything right, working in
probably 80% of the exposition without dialogue, as in the Rockford Files
opening, where, by the time the camera gets to Bowfinger, we already know
him and his type: that, because he's existed at the fringe, never succeeded,
he thus deserves to succeed. Bowfinger is, after all, a Cinderella-story, a
structure familiar enough to us that Steve Martin can get a little fantastic
with it and not lose us altogether.
However familiar, though, the structure and the writing can't quite hide the
occasionally inconsistent humor, the absurdist moments when someone made the
decision to go for the compulsive laugh when this isn't a movie about the
compulsive laugh. It's more akin to Rushmoore, or, talking Steve Martin, LA
Story. Also painfully apparent is how unnecessary Jiff is to the development
of Bowfinger. Yes, a clown character was needed there, but there's no reason
for Eddie Murphy to play two roles for it. Granted, it looked good in the
trailer, it worked in the first Austin Powers and it was what Dead Ringers
was all about, but more often than not, one actor with two roles is either a
glitzy hindrance or overcorrection for a weak story. And Steve Martin didn't
write a weak story here, meaning Jiff just slows things down, or, provides
the plausible excuse for the plot to lurch forward when it really had enough
momentum that it was going to lurch regardless. Other than that, though,
Bowfinger is about as close to flawless as it gets, right down to the
spoof-ending (every martial arts movie), which, while eerily reminiscent of
a similar scene in Half-Baked, is, like everything else in Bowfinger,
somehow just a little better.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Bicentennial Man (1999)
Stories tend to come in two flavors: either the hero is in some sort of
jeopardy (emotional, mortal, existential, etc) the whole time, or the hero
is on some quest, during which he has to overcome various (life-threatening,
etc) obstacles. Granted, as both of these story-types entail not only
'jeopardy' but the eventual completion of some 'goal,' it's easy to assume
the two flavors are actually one. But they're not: the first situation tends
to result from the hero's meddling--be it purposeful or not--while the
second isn't quite so moral, as the hero has committed no 'crime' for which
all this jeopardy is just dessert. There is still some 'just dessert,'
however; without it, audience expectation would grind down to nothing, and
we'd lose interest. It's just that now that just dessert takes the form of
the hero achieving his goal. Which is to say the hero is deserving, has been
wronged in some way that achieving his quest can right. Of course, then,
too, the more naive and 'wronged' the hero is, the more deserving he is.
It's a sympathy-identification trick, and in Bicentennial Man it works
exactly as it should, to the point where we willfully overlook all the
dramatic problems that arise when compressing a 200 year life span into a
little more than two hours, because all that's important is whether or not
Android Andrew Martin (Robin Williams) will do the Frankenstein-shuffle just
about every mechanical man in cinema tries to pull off at one time or
another: becoming human.
And it's an interesting journey, ('Awakening,' yes) from the
undifferentiated assembly line Bicentennial Man opens with to the uniqueness
Andrew eventually achieves, as technology allows his mechanical self to be
absorbed by his 'human' self: all his robot parts retreat under the skin,
until it's just Robin Williams, albeit a Robin Williams who blinks with the
sound of carriage returns on a typewriter. And the years pass, and the Pepsi
generations slide by, and Andrew's adopted family dies off one by one,
until--like Frankenstein again, or Duncan McCloud (Highlander)--Andrew
becomes lonely. And of course the cure for loneliness is companionship, a
mate. Thing is, though, this future society insists upon classing him with
the household appliances, (per Cherry 2000, etc) nevermind how involved he
is in this all too human condition. He does, after all, still have a
positronic mind, is still hardwired to obey Asimov's Three Laws of Robotics.
Too, he can project movies from the top of his head. Add to this his
immortality and presto, achieving his quest (of being human, where 'human'
is a legal term for the courts to decide) just became that much more
difficult. We've got to have escalation, after all, along with some
insurmountable odds. This is how heroes are made.
It's not the only way they're made, though. There also has to be the unusual
(accidental, in Andrew's case; Short Circuit-type stuff) birth and the
requisite attempts on his life when he's still the equivalent of an infant.
And of course the love interest, (Embeth Davidtz, in two roles across time)
the bungling sidekick, (mad scientist Oliver Platt) and, in Bicentennial Man
at least, the bungling sidekick's bungling sidekick, Galatea, (as in 2.2)
all of whom are instrumental in helping Andrew realize his human potential,
which of course nobody could have injected with as much meaning as Robin
Williams, never afraid to give the old heartstrings a tug. Does society ever
recognize Andrew as human, though? As Bicentennial Man unfolds, it matters
less and less, as the real issue isn't finally in how one's perceived, but
in how one perceives oneself (to use Andrew's androgynous pronoun). Which is
to say that, even though this is supposed to be the flavor of story not
driven by morality, there's still a message in there. And Bicentennial Man
is involving enough that you don't even realize it takes nearly two and half
hours to get that message across. Granted, not much really 'happens' in the
movie, but still, you kind of want it to go on.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Title
Review for Galaxy Quest (1999)
As we all know, Earth started polluting interstellar space with television
signals in 1939. Fast-forward 60-odd years now, into a reality for all
intents and purposes ours, except here Star Trek isn't Star Trek, but the
all-too similarly cloaked "Galaxy Quest." During those 60-odd years, too,
some of those escaped television signals have cultured an audience, in the
literal sense. Specifically, an alien audience without any notion of
'fiction,' meaning, to them, the cast of characters who comprise "Galaxy
Quest" are real, capable of heroics, etc. And yes, this has been done
before, once in Twilight Zone and more recently in Futurama, but now it's
feature length and packed with stars: Tim Allen as James Nesmith playing
Captain Taggart; Sigourney Weaver as Gwen Demarco playing busty Tawny
Madison; Alan Rickman as Alexander Dane reluctantly playing Dr. Lazarus;
more.
Too, it starts where all Trekkie-type stuff lives and breathes: at the
ubiquitous convention, done up per SNL. A cast of characters still wearing
their costumes 20 years after the show was cancelled, all of them fully
aware both of how ridiculous this all is and how, without it, they would
have nothing. Well, all of them are aware except for Nesmith, the 'captain,'
who's so addicted to the ego-rush associated with star treatment that he
continually ostracizes his fellow hangers-on. Soon enough he cues in that
he's a joke though, meaning his self-confidence dwindles to nothing. Which
of course sets Galaxy Quest up as now having somewhere to go, something to
do, a narrative arc to follow: regain Nesmith's self-confidence for him,
make him believe in himself again.
The bad thing about this is, though, that Nesmith's lived with 'Captain
Taggart' so long that the two are inextricable. Or, more than that, the
Taggart character is even the dominant one, where Nesmith really exists.
Solution? Get Taggart his self-confidence back, which is where the
ultra-nave aliens enter: the best way to boost a starship captain's
self-confidence is to give him a real starship, one they've painstakingly
modeled after the cardboard one on television. It's the old Narnia fantasy,
where, if you're nobody in your 'real' life, just step into the closet, into
another world, where everybody knows your name.
Of course, however, restoring Taggart's faith in himself is just the aliens'
function. Their motivation, as it has to be, isn't so charitable: they just
want Taggart and crew to save them from some scary looking, Men in Black-ish
aliens. Which proves to be quite entertaining, watching the "Galaxy Quest"
crew come together as a team and wing their way through their old roles.
And, no, nothing that happens is really unexpected--including their
'savior,' who gets sorethumbed early on--but all the same, it's funny enough
and fast enough that it doesn't really matter. You don't go to Galaxy Quest
to be moved, after all, you go for the send-up, the adventure, the space
bloopers, for Tim Allen in another good role (The Santa Clause, Toy Story),
for Sigourney Weaver back in zero-gravity, with blond hair, fighting aliens
again. Really, the most difficult part of Galaxy Quest is trying to endure
all the kiddy trailers that are part of the package. If you can make it
through that, though, it's all 'second star on the left and on till dawn'
stuff from there on out, which is precisely the mix of Never-Never Land and
space opera we need, now that Kirk's out of the picture.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Traditionally, a commercial movie, no matter how experimental it pretends to
be, will nevertheless cling to at least one dramatic requirement: the
introduction, early on, of a problem, a question to be answered, something
to be solved. It's important to get the audience's interest piqued early on,
after all, else they won't pay attention. And the rules are simple: if it's
a detective movie, start moments after the crime; if it's action, blow
something up in the opening frames; if it's romance, start with heartbreak;
if it's horror, kill somebody mysteriously; if it's drama, say Rosebud. Give
us a starting point, something by which to gauge the progression of whatever
narrative arc follows, lest we won't be engaged with the thing, will pay
more attention to our popcorn/coke ratio. Or, in a movie better than three
hours long, like Magnolia, we'll start paying attention to bladder
elasticity, especially since Magnolia doesn't give us that initial problem
to be solved.
Thing is, though, it does something better, something unexpected. Instead of
involving us dramatically from the get-go, it offers a little narrated
preface--the ostensible 'author' speaking directly to us, documenting what
he calls 'matters of chance,' which comes to a handful of those
ultra-coincidental stories we see anthologized in all those Strange
Stories/Amazing Facts types books (if you're familiar with the Darwin
Awards, you'll recognize some of them). What the narrator's doing is trying
to extract meaning from those coincidental events, trying to make sense of a
jumbled set of 'accidents' that, for one beautiful moment, all came together
as something much greater than themselves, make the death they all conspired
in a work of art.
And now, after allowing us a few moments to swallow this, to agree with him
that strange forces are at work/play behind the curtains, the 'movie'
starts, and, coincidentally enough, it's all just jumbled stuff going on,
about as directionless as can be. Think Slacker, or--as we do have a cast so
large--Shortcuts. Lots of scene-hopping, simultaneity (contiguity), more
characters than you can initially remember names for, much less
relationships between. Yet, all the same, you're not only interested, you're
likely watching closer than you've watched any of those movies with
'traditional' hook-openings. Why? Because of the preface, because the
narrator has properly prepped us for Magnolia, has intimated not only that
mixed-up stuff can all come together into something wonderful, sometimes,
but that it's going to happen here. What the preface does is function as a
seductive admonition to pay attention, to not dismiss each scene as it fades
from the screen but to keep it in mind with all the others, to weigh them
the same until you know where and how they go, to hold them in some buffer
portion of your mind until they can all be applied, at once. That'll be the
rush (incidentally, this kind of rush also qualifies for the strict
definition of 'catharsis'--letting out all the emotions at once, only here,
those emotions are fabricated within the movie, by the movie, not something
you bring to the theater yourself). Magnolia quietly promises such a rush,
promises that all these random goings-on will eventually gel. Which puts us
into the position to attempt to anticipate when where and how they'll come
together.
Before it comes, though, that cathartic rush, those are the three of the
better hours in moviedom, simply because, as we've been allowing everything
the same weight, the same charge, the same level of meaning, and we suspect
that there is a lot of meaning here, it's just temporarily unapplied,
everything thus has the full meaning of Magnolia within it, in a potential
state. We don't know if Frank T.J. Mackey's (Tom Cruise) motivational
seminar is the key, if Officer Curring (John C. Reilly) losing his gun is
the key, if a dog eating a dying man's pills is the key, or what, so we
treat all of them as equally important, until we know better. And it's
refreshing to traffic in a reality like that, where everything's magic,
where everything means something, it's all interconnected. To see how it all
fits we just have to, as American Beauty suggests, look closer.
As close as you look, however, still, just when you think you've got it all
figured out, you don't. And you couldn't have. Really. Seriously. Part of
you might feel it's unfair, but then the other part of you's caught up in
the thrill of it. The nearest approximation would have to be in Fisher King,
when all the train-station people lock arms and start dancing, but this is
better, has that same meaningful feel as the cafe-robbery in Pulp Fiction,
only everything's in sequence here, and nobody's screaming and shooting etc.
I would say Magnolia is the most original movie in a long time, only we're
just coming off American Beauty, Being John Malkovich. Suffice it to say
that, as American Beauty and Being John Malkovich do, Magnolia also raises
the standard, and raises it quite a bit. It's to cinema as Sixth Sense was
to horror. And, like it or not, you do take that same mode of perception it
requires with you, out of the theater, if only for a while. You don't look
at something for three hours and then just look away, after all. And, in
Magnolia's case, you don't really even want to look away in the first place.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Random Hearts (1999)
In Eyes Wide Shut--which Sidney Pollack also had a bit part in--a husband
overextends himself trying to deal with his wife's betrayal. Random Hearts
isn't so different, insofar that 'Dutch' Vand Den Broeck (Harrison Ford)
also goes to great lengths in an effort to deal with his wife's adultery. An
occasionally misguided effort, but then we all know love isn't rational.
Random Hearts is kin to Kubrick's swan song in more ways than just story,
though. Pollack seems to be consciously imitating the precise camerawork and
haunting music of Eyes Wide Shut (length as well). They just feel the same.
However. Random Hearts, in spite of a sub-par title, has a much stronger
story.
Instead of grounding it in myth, per Kubrick, Pollack (or, novelist Warren
Adler) chooses instead to order the unlikely romance of Dutch and
Congresswoman-hopeful Kay Chandler (the aquiline Kristin Scott Thomas)
around something like the cuckold's idea of fair play: that if you slept
with my wife, I'll sleep with yours. And vice-versa for Kay. And what kicks
it all off is a variation on another trope: the husband dying in the wrong
bed. Except of course this time it's a plane. And they both die. And Dutch,
Internal Affairs detective that he is (his job is to investigate 'improper
conduct'), is compelled not only to try to make sense of this affair through
good, solid policework, but is also intent upon making Kay face up to what's
happened.
All of which makes for a strong story, especially since Dutch's motivations
are so complex: Is he investigating because knowledge will be some sort of
curative, in spite of how much it'll hurt to 'know?' If so, then it's a
rather masochistic narrative, as if he's punishing himself for never having
realized what was going on. Too, though--and he even goes so far to say
this, which is of course our cue to doubt it--he could just be trying to
figure out why his wife would feel the need to have an affair. As if the
reason is going to present itself in the form of something tangible she and
her lover left behind, yes, as Kay deftly points out. Which is to say he's
on a fool's mission. But then, they both are. Grief isn't easy. And, by
sifting through the immediate past, they don't make it any easier.
What's really nice about Random Hearts, though, is that Pollack/Adler has
Dutch and Kay more or less begin repeating the 'crimes' of their
deceased/adulterous spouses, in that they start keeping secrets from each
other, getting paranoid, all that, which plays out wonderfully, if a little
long. The high point of it though is that soon enough Kay's in 'competition'
for Dutch--with Dutch's dead wife. Meaning now he's the one cheating. If
sleeping with your wife's lover's lover is fair play, then this would have
to be a moralistic refraction of that: that fair play and the idea of poetic
justice aren't that distant, are in fact causally related, in that in order
to bring about fair play, Dutch has to 'become' his wife. It's all pretty
delicious.
Just so things don't get too monotonous, though, Random Hearts also has some
distraction, in the form of Dutch's ongoing Internal Affairs investigation,
which, because it doesn't tie into Kay's election campaign in all the
high-stakes ways we expect it too, doesn't make us get into any suspended
disbelief games with the movie. It does matter some, though, of course, but
in such an offhand way that you wonder how you missed it. Or, rather, wonder
how you dismissed it. Which is what good moviemaking is all about. Random
Hearts is a good movie, in spite of the fact that it seems to end in the
same airport as Love of the Game. It is a love story after all, and airports
do more or less represent conventional moments of decision as far as
relationships are concerned. And, any last second typicalness is more than
made up for by the atypical complexity that comes before. It's not often
that a movie can end in as generic a place as an airport terminal and still
manage to remain unique. Random Hearts does just that.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Pitch Black (2000)
Pitch Black: don't let the sun do down on me
Pitch Black operates on the same premise as Asimov's "Nightfall": when the
sun goes down, the calamity starts. In "Nightfall," however, what darkness
brings with it is social upheaval, the breakdown of civilization, all that,
which is to say the cycle of destruction functions as some kind of vague
statement, warning us that the same thing can happen to us if we panic in
the face of the unknown, if we don't pay heed to the old stories, etc. With
Pitch Black, as there are some nocturnal aliens that would do Sigourney
Weaver proud, the imperative is worlds simpler: just don't let the sun set
on you.
This isn't to say that the movie is unsophisticated, however. Far from it.
The attention paid to the photography and the editing here is your first
indication, how director David Twohy says so much with camera movement and
composition that it takes the burden off the characters, allows their
dialogue to be that much less contrived. The second indication is simply the
quality of writing, how Jim and Ken Wheat manage to graft so many disparate
conventions into Pitch Black, yet do it subtly enough that things never
quite become predictable--or at least not that kind of predictable we're
accustomed to with effects-dependent horror.
It all starts with a worst-case scenario, a deep space transport proving
that Con-Air rule, that convicts are far too heavy to remain aloft for long.
So, in a camera-shaking fit that would do Blair Witch proud, Pitch Black's
2001-ish looking ship crash lands, and, per Supernova, the captain is the
first to die, meaning that now a leader has to emerge from the ragtag
survivors. Meet Caroline Fry (Radha Mitchell), who, as all final girls must,
goes by the gender inspecific 'Fry' and isn't afraid to get her hands dirty.
Getting top-billing along with her are Johns (Cole Hauser, with a
"nickel-slick" badge) and his escape-artist prisoner Riddick (Vin Diesel,
still anti-gun here, as with Iron Giant), perhaps the naturalest born killer
ever.
For an unusually long time, too, there are no Starship Trooper bugs to
contend with, just a sun-scorched, washed-out planet, shot with the same
lens as Three Kings, it seems. That bright. It's all about contrast, though,
setting us up for nightfall, which, due to some Thing-type discoveries
(abandoned research post, etc), Fry & Co. slowly learn to fear. At times it
feels a lot like Screamers, just without that Phillip K. Dick distrust of
reality. As with Screamers, however, there is some distrust between the
characters. Will Riddick kill them all? Will he steal the ship and leave
them for alien-bait? To Pitch Black's credit, you really don't know until
the final frames, simply because it's hard to tell who the main character
here is. You expect it to be Fry, the final girl, but then, too, Riddick's
voice-over started the whole thing, introduced us to everyone. As if this
was his story. So you just don't know, and that's refreshing.
You do, however, know that, once nightfall catches them unaware, anyone
without a name is expendable. And these hammerheaded bats of space make
short and graphic work of them. That's all to be expected. But then there's
the tagline, too--'Fight evil with evil.' Which is to say that, in the
absence of society, Riddick's sociopathic tendencies aren't that bad, might
in fact be what saves this crew, what redeems him. Nevertheless, though--and
counter--intuitively-Pitch Black's strongest moments are after the crash and
before the darkness comes, when Twohy can effectively fill the frame with so
much, so fast. After dark, he can't do that, and Pitch Black gets reduced
down to action and special effects. Still, as far as off-world sci-fi goes,
Pitch Black combines strong writing and excellent direction which
establishes it well above the crowd, makes the genre somehow more
legitimate. And, as far as the horror-aspects go, prepare for something
different. Fry could very well be the final, final girl.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Sleepy Hollow (1999)
Sleepy Hollow: lost in the age of reason
Washington Irving's The Legend of Sleepy Hollow has traditionally been
classed with children's lit., and is subsequently invoked every Halloween
along with Charlie Brown specials etc. Which is to say the figure of the
headless horsemen has--via steady bombardment (see: product placement)--lost
much of its scare power, become tame enough for the kids. That's all past
tense, now, with Tim Burton's Sleepy Hollow, which (re)injects fear back
into Irving's story much as Michael Cohn returned the macabre to Snow White
(1997). Of course, too, we all know that the old fairytales were pretty
harsh to start with--the oral equivalent of a warning sign, the
grammar-school equivalent of 'scared straight' programs--but all those
fairytales are imported, have their roots in Europe and Central Europe. The
Legend of Sleepy Hollow, on the other hand, is American, which is to say
still new. Who'd have thought there was anything Grimm going on between the
lines? But there is, or there can be. 1799 does belong to the same decade as
the Salem Witch Trials, after all (see Hawthorne's "Young Goodman Brown" for
a Pre-Burton, Burton tone).
And we all know the story: a bungling Ichabod Crane stumbles into Sleepy
Hollow, into the mystery of a 'headless' horsemen with a vorpal blade. It's
Scooby Doo stuff, yes, all reliant upon levels of curiosity never really
accounted for in character. So, Burton and screenwriter Kevin Yagher simply
changed that, made Ichabod not a schoolteacher, but something like the first
forensic pathologist (~Twain's Pudd'nhead Wilson). Altering the job title
isn't quite enough, however, so they take it one step further, and have
'Constable' Crane's superiors charge him with figuring out these
decapitations. It's more than just a droll homicide case for Ichabod,
though. Sleepy Hollow is his one, good chance to prove his "trappings of
scientific investigation"--a host of DaVinci-clever autopsy devices. The bad
thing is, his one good chance turns out to be impenetrable to reason. It's
hard to measure the supernatural.
There are a few carryovers from the old version, though, too: Ichabod is
still slightly bungling, in the sense that he's prone to feint when
dramatically necessary. And, when he can stay conscious, he tends to use
children as shields. When he's unconscious, though, we get to see his inner
life to a certain extent--what personal demons are driving him to privilege
science over the supernatural. So perhaps his feinting is simply economical,
an easy way into his head. Another carryover is Ichabod's romantic
involvement with Katrina (Christina Ricci), which develops nicely, under the
watchful eye of both her current suitor (Caspar Van Diem) and her current
mother (Miranda Richardson).
And then of course there's the headless horsemen, Hessian mercenary
Christopher Walken at his evil best, made to fit for Burton's colonial
America, where the dead are restless and the cleavage rampant. He does keep
it all reined in, though--never gets quite lost enough in the period that he
thinks he owns the story, can change its fundamentals (1995's Scarlet
Letter). Well, he almost doesn't get that lost. The one time he does, when
ascribing motives to who turns out to be the 'real' bad guy here, he sets
things up such that the bad guy is simply serving some justice on Sleepy
Hollow, albeit it with interest. Which typically allows only two endings:
either the town accepts responsibility for starting the whole mess or the
bad guy kills them all. Sleepy Hollow takes neither path here, but instead
seems to ignore the whole issue, which leaves an important narrative
development conspicuously undeveloped. In it's defense, though, it does give
Washington Irving's tale back to the adults, who themselves may not be quite
old enough for the graphic nature of some of the decapitations.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
The Talented Mr Ripley: single white male
These Pacific Heights type stories are usually told from the victims' point
of view, which serves to make the 'villain' more threatening, as he could
pop into any scene. In The Talented Mr. Ripley, director Anthony Minghella
(working from Patricia Highsmith's novel, the first in a series of
Ripley-novels) takes the alternate route, tells the story from the
'villain's' point of view. Meaning he's in just about every scene, so what
'pops up' to surprise us from time to time is his sociopathic nature. And he
is sick, the kind of sick that feeds your ego simply to steal your identity.
But that's his talent--the human chameleon. And, as all chameleons (and
secret agents, a similar breed) must, he has no past, no history; there's no
real 'explanation' for his actions, and barely any hints. Meaning of course
he's the ideal blank slate upon which to impress an identity, any identity.
All he needs is a mark.
Highsmith supplies one via a little Henry James/Ambassadors shuffle: Ripley
(Matt Damon) bluffs his way into an assignment to travel to Italy and
retrieve a rich man's son, Dickie Greenleaf, (Jude Law) living in some
particularly Edenic niche of Italy with Marge, (Gwyneth Paltrow) his
girlfriend. So yes, it's a guy, a girl, and a garden spot. All we need now
is the snake: enter Ripley, ingratiating himself into their confidences,
living with them, studying them. Initially it's all about adoration, but
that quickly escalates into jealousy, and from jealousy it's an easy step up
to the conclusion that they--or, Dickie--isn't really deserving of this
decadent, expatriate lifestyle. Or, at least isn't as deserving, which, to
Ripley--already operating under the Raskolnikov moral code (if I can do it,
I should)--serves as all the moral compulsion/permission he needs. When the
circumstances permit, and as the trailer tells us, he becomes Dickie,
assumes Dickie's identity, which is where The Talented Mr. Ripley really
gets fun.
We did love Jack Tripper's antics after all--always pretending to be one,
two, or more people at once. Ripley's doing essentially the same thing, only
now, when the coincidences start piling up against him, he simply kills his
way out. Anything but get caught. And he does have some Flashman (George
MacDonald Fraser's 'Ripley') type luck, but not too much. Meaning it's all
credible, more or less, even as the body count rises. Interestingly, too,
Minghella, instead of having his 'hero' (Ripley) be flat out bad, draws him
as strangely driven, each time torturing himself for what he 'has' to do,
etc. Which is a nice touch, allows us a little sympathy for an otherwise
unsympathetic character, enough that we even want him to get out of each
scrape alive, by his wits alone (per Bond). It's impressive, or,
impressively written, and never quite gets stale or overly predictable. The
last twenty minutes even tease us with a Clay Pigeons ending, by introducing
a private investigator (Philip Baker Hall, still Seinfeld's library cop) and
a run of particularly bad luck for Ripley. For him, though, there's always
an answer, a proven solution to anything: just start killing. And the thing
is, we kind of want him to. His most attractive quality, after all, is his
sociopathic nature, so the more it surfaces, the better. With Silence of the
Lambs, what we really wanted was more Hannibal. In The Talented Mr. Ripley,
we get it.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Lest we forget, Deliverance was 1972. Six years later The Hills Have Eyes.
Two decades later they still do. And James Dickey's backwoods have always
been there in the unconscious, waiting. What The Blair Witch Project does is
take us back to those woods, and then leave us there with three film
students--Josh(ua Leonard), Mic(hael Williams), and Heather (Donahue)--there
to document the Blair Witch Legend, get in and get out. But, as the opening
title card informs, they never make it out, meaning that during the next
80-odd minutes the issue isn't Will they die, but How will they die? Which
is quite a gamble for independents Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez,
dramatically speaking. But they make it pay. Before the opening sequence is
even over, narrative matters have ceased to intrude. This thanks to
genre--not horror, but documentary: they idea that anything can happen, and
did.
But the documentary brings with it its own set of conventions, one of which
is that the filmmaker is able to keep and objective distance from the
subject. Which is to say the filmmaker doesn't believe. Which, conveniently
enough, is the first mistake in any horror film. The second is to get
suddenly curious. Here, Myrick and Sanchez provide that tragic curiosity via
documentary interest, and then collapse any and all objective distance Josh
and Mike and Heather might have had from the Blair Witch Legend by making
them subject to it. Which is exactly the kind of sophisticated reversal so
often absent from horror.
All the same though, this is a horror movie. Josh Mike and Heather do make
all the typical mistakes--splitting up, with-holding information, turning on
each other, etc--and they do often choose, as Josh says, to stay and record
instead of help, but still, it never quite becomes formulaic. And it's not
just about cinematography, presentation, improvised lines, so-called
method-filmmaking. It's about stumbling deeper and deeper into the darkness.
The Blair Witch Project draws upon our most primal fear--the unseen
presence. The strongest scenes in it aren't the ones with the leaves rushing
by and the noises just beyond the frame, they're the ones where the screen
is black, and all we have to gon on is audio whispers. The weakest points
perhaps all occur in the first 15 minutes, where Myrick and Sanchez had to
edit this raw footage together in a back and forth manner, so as to firmly
establish that everything we're seeing is through the camera of a
crewmember. A necessary evil, perhaps, in the absence of voice-overs or
scores or potential soundtracks we're trained to cue into.
Does The Blair Witch Project intend to retrain us, though? Perhaps. If we
pay attention. First, however, it just disturbs us at a fundamental level,
and then, by foregoing the Hollywood ending, it doesn't take that
disturbance away. Suddenly, American cinema isn't so American anymore.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for House on Haunted Hill (1999)
The premise of The House on Haunted Hill is as schlocky as they come:
whoever lives through the night gets a million dollars. Forget about all the
foreshadowing and character motivations and exposition &etc that a typical
horror movie usually has to wade through in order to get to the haunted
house. The House on Haunted Hill neatly circumvents all that, via 'random'
invitations. Meaning of course there's that many more minutes it can devote
to horror. Which is to say it can pack more scares into two hours than your
typical horror movie.
It all starts in a mental hospital that would do Terry Gilliam proud: all
electroshock and twisting pipes--the interior of the house on haunted hill,
where the inmates are in the process of doing to the doctors what the
doctors have been doing to them all along. Disturbing Behavior type stuff,
times about twenty-six. And the mad doctor here is none other than evil Dr.
Vannacutt, a cenobite candidate if there ever was one. Fifty years later,
all that remains is the building, which entertainment park mogul Steven
Price (Casanova Frankenstein himself, Geoffrey Rush) chooses as the
extravagant site of his wife Evelyn's (Famke Janssen, recovered from The
Faculty perhaps, going for another Lord of Illusions role) birthday party.
Add to this five anonymous guests and the fact that Steven and Evelyn are
each using the 'party' as a means of murdering the other, and you've got The
House on Haunted Hill.
But it's more than that, too. If The Blair Witch Project disturbed us with
the unseen, then The House on Haunted Hill disturbs us with what we have to
see. From the opening credits until the last ten minutes (when it loses it,
trying to portray evil as black smoke) it's something of a mix between the
imagery of a Marilyn Manson video and the stop-motion feel of a Jan
Svankmajer short, with some Jakob's Ladder thrown in for good measure. And
forget about The Haunting. This is a whole nother neighborhood, a
significantly darker neighborhood. Too, with Zemeckis and Silver at the
controls, you know the whole thing's going to be a music-fed adrenaline
rush, complete with the necessary level of comedy, which Chris Kattan's
Pritchett delivers time and again.
In keeping with the spirit of things, the guests/contestants--Eddie (Taye
Diggs), Sarah Wolfe (Ali Larter), Melissa Marr (Bridgette Wilson) and Dr.
Blackburn (Peter Gallagher)-all do what they're supposed to do, which more
or less just includes fighting among themselves, separating, and
investigating those things which should never ever be investigated. And of
course they tend to die gruesome little deaths, which just serves to remind
us that this isn't Hitchcock: the horror is no longer in the motion being
completed off-screen, in our minds. Now it's right there, for better or
worse. A lot of the images we take with us too, whether we want to or not.
Specifically, how director William Malone rearranges the human face from
time to time--lengthening the jaw, erasing the eyes, enlarging the mouth,
all of which disturbs us at a primal level. We're comfortable with an
augmented face, so long as it has recognizable, bilateral features. Take
that away though, and things aren't so comfortable anymore.
The House on Haunted Hill does make you want to look away at times, yes, but
it's that kind of wanting-to-look-away you pay for, too, you peek through
your fingers for. And, as narrative counterballast, it does have it's
tongue-in-cheek moments. Take how Pritchett's Brad-and-Janet mobile has
characteristically broken down, as if the flaw in that particular model is
that it tends to putter out in the presence of lonely, deserted houses. And,
as with most horror, The House on Haunted Hill has its weak moments as well,
when a character's comeback to whatever situation falls flat, but so be it.
The next scene is guaranteed to either make you forget it or die trying,
which is what a good Halloween release is all about.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
When someone's paranoid in a movie and no believes him or her, that paranoia
will be justified. It's cliche. Similarly, when the neighbors are perfect,
they aren't. In Arlington Road, Michael Faraday, (Jeff Bridges) teacher of
an American-Terrorism course, suspects his neighbors just might be
terrorists. And no one believes him. And this isn't the second installment
of Blown Away. It does fade-in moments after an explosion, though, with one
of the strongest opening sequences since se7en, which both sets the
combustible tone for the rest of the movie and, in economical fashion,
serves to introduce widower Faraday to his new neighbors, Oliver Lang (Tim
Robbins)and stepford-wife Cheryl (Joan Cusack).
Soon enough Faraday begins to uncover what we already know from the trailer:
that the Langs aren't perfect. Which makes all the foreshadowing concerning
them a little heavy-handed, but so be it. In writer Ehren Kruger's credit,
however, Faraday's dawning suspicion is at least layered in with grief for
his wife, which is effecting his current relationship with his girlfriend,
whose presence is causing something of a rift between Faraday and his son,
etc. And all this develops more or less simultaneously, to the point where
it begins to seem this may all be one of those narratives where the
emotionally-maimed protagonist (Faraday) is only able to achieve cathartic
release via immersion in some high-tension storyline.
But it's not.
At it's most basic level it's closer to another narrative, most recently
commercialized in Sleepers : the criminal initially getting away with the
crime, then somewhere down the road encountering one of his victims wholly
by chance, who metes out justice. But too, and in spite of its cast,
Sleepers was a failure. Arlington Road isn't, again thanks to strong
writing, to the fact that Oliver Lang isn't directly implicated in the death
of Faraday's wife, but is instead simply identified as the type whose file
gets flagged by the FBI. Faraday's wife died investigating such a flag.
Constructing it this way you get the association without the causality,
which--because not dependent upon serendipity--is even stronger. Meaning we
wholly expect Faraday to mete out some long-overdue justice to Lang, which
is right where Kruger wants us: these carefully cultured expectations allow
Arlington Road to use less contrivance to turn everything upside down, which
it does very effectively in the closing frames. And quietly.
The thing is, in a movie about bombs, the plot's about subtlety. Not just
the inevitable surprise we've come to anticipate, but a development which
forces us to reconstruct the whole movie scene by scene. Which is rarely
done well. Even rarer is that, in retrospect, (and disregarding the opening
sequence) every prior event is open to dual interpretation. Perhaps it was
Mark Pellington's unobtrusive camerawork that eased our suspicions; perhaps
it was simply Tim Robbins and Jeff Bridges on-screen together, never a
mistimed delivery or stray eyebrow between them. Either way, Arlington Road
is far and away the best college-professor-just-trying-to-get-out-alive
movie since D.O.A., though it is loyal to it all the same.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Crazy in Alabama (1999)
Crazy in Alabama is an 'I learned a lot of secrets that summer' movie,
in-line with Stand by Me and all the Stand by Me pretenders. Which is to say
it's retrospective, nostalgic, voiced-over, all that. And, as it's set in
the summer of 1965, any ritual growing up that's done is of course a growing
up into 'America,' a harsh realization of what 'America' means. Setting the
movie in Alabama is simply economical, as it allows easier access to all the
racial turmoil which defined America in the 1960s. It also gives Lucas
Black--Peejoe in the movie--license to get thick and heavy with Southern
dialect, which he does as well as anybody and better than most.
It opens as any ritual growing-up movie has to: with him being a kid, in the
country, still clinging to his illusions, etc, all of which has to change
almost immediately. It does. Enter his Aunt Lucille (Melanie Griffith), on
the run from murder charges, telling him the 'secrets' of the murder she's
committed. Which is to say that instead of treating him like a kid, she's
functioning as the catalyst to his coming of age cycle here. Up to this
point--and if you can ignore the oddly dissonant, comical credit sequence up
front--Crazy in Alabama is a coherent movie, but as soon as Lucille
confesses to Peejoe, it quickly falls apart, or, perhaps tries to thematize
the racial division of the times via dividing itself into two movies.
The first movie is pretty much a solo Thelma and Louise: Lucille, trekking
across the country to be a starlet in Hollywood, her list of charges growing
longer with every stop. Granted, Crazy in Alabama does add a talking head
(the husband she murdered) to the mix, and does have Lucille pull off in
Vegas what Woody and Demi couldn't in Indecent Proposal, but still, it's all
about a woman doing away with paternalistic social constraints and cutting
loose for awhile. Period.
The second movie is a little better, as it contains the character who's
supposed to 'develop' here, Peejoe, something of a mix between Huck Finn and
Forrest Gump. Which is to say he's naive enough that all this racism he
finds himself thrust in the middle of simply doesn't make sense. Sum: he
sees too well. Result: he loses an eye. Simple stuff. And of course there's
Meat Loaf as racist Sheriff Doggett (see the Sheriff in the 1990 Night of
the Living Dead for the same character), Peejoe's mortal enemy. And of
course Crazy in Alabama does make a meager effort to causally tie Lucille's
story together with Peejoe's, but it's so heavy-handed and predictable that
it winds up being a bit more anticlimactic than is really needed at the
moment.
Crazy in Alabama does have its moments though, like when Taylor Jackson
dies, how in the unfocused background there's a bird flying up. Or Lucille's
whole Cinderella-in-Hollywood trip, where everything matters because we know
when that clock strikes twelve, she's got to cash it all in. Too, the whole
thing is almost salvaged by one supporting character--Judge Mead (Rod
Steiger)--easily the best performance in the movie, even if he is caught in
a courtroom which exists wherever To Kill a Mockingbird and Time to Kill
intersect. But he is just one character, and there's really too much wrong
in Crazy in Alabama for him to compensate for. As a movie about growing up
in the racial turmoil of the 1960s, it might have succeeded--there's some
good material there--but as is, there's another movie edited in, and it's
difficult to tell which is supposed to be primary.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Thirteenth Floor, The (1999)
The Thirteenth Floor: interdimensional mol
The tagline for The Thirteenth Floor is 'You can go there even though it
doesn't exist.' As far as things go that don't exist, though, the simulated
1937 we start with is pretty convincing, or, is made even more convincing by
Armin Mueller-Stahl's Hannon Fuller character, whose nervous eyes, hesitant
accent, and slight bearing seem to somehow fit director Josef Ruznak's 1930s
quite properly. Of course, however, Hannon Fuller is nervous for a reason:
though the simulation is 'his,' he's nevertheless made some discovery about
it, which he must pass on. But there'd be no movie if it was all that easy.
Meaning he dies to forward the plot, and with him dies a lot of the
potential depth of The Thirteenth Floor--the moral issues etc involved with
using this alternate reality as a hedonistic rest stop, where you can have a
whole nother identity if you choose. eXistenZ kind of stuff, just without
the overt game aspect. Or, Dark City kind of stuff, without the
skull-piercing hypodermics. Or, talking the last couple of weeks, Matrix
kind of stuff, with a smaller budget and lot more noir.
But back to the plot Hannon Fuller died for, the investigation which results
from his death and tries to form the dramatic backbone of the movie. The
chief suspect here is research associate / business partner Douglas Hall
(Craig Bierko playing Bruce Campbell), who, to clear himself, of course has
to go back into the simulation, gumshoe around for clues. Like
Mueller-Stahl, too, the costumers make him fit the 1930s very nicely. In
fact, he fits there so well he starts having some ontological difficulty,
('what constitutes the real?') so when one of the computer-generated
characters (Vincent D'Onofrio) begins acting strangely, as if he might
somehow be aware that this is all computer-generated, the simulation starts
crumbling. Along with Hall's life, and his chances of getting out of this
investigation alive.
His only chance, really, is figuring out what role Fuller's
long-lost-and-never-mentioned daughter Jane Fuller (Gretchen Mol) is
playing. Or, really, figuring out who she is, if she is, all that fun stuff
that goes hand in hand with virtual reality. In the detective drama The
Thirteenth Floor is trying hard to emulate, Jane Fuller is the mysterious
lady, the trouble-bringer. Meaning of course the two have to fall into bed
together, just to settle their differences. And this goes on for a while,
perhaps too long, or, definitely too long without some forward movement. But
this is an easy mistake to make in noir--more attention given to how the
rain looks on the asphalt at night than the dramatic stuff going on. At
least there's no voice-over. That would have been too much. Is the ending a
surprise, though? In light of eXistenZ, maybe not. Think of it as the
Nightmare on Elm Street ending, the one for which Gotcha! had the right
title.
Ignoring all the other VR movies for the moment, The Thirteenth Floor is
strong; in light of them, however--or, in it's own Pink Floyd tribute-light
(lasers, smoke)--things start to feel just a little conventional. The
Thirteenth Floor isn't so much a victim of weak movie-making as it is a
victim of a burgeoning genre, a genre trying to be both identifiable through
a recognizable group of developments and original each time. Thing is, the
two don't go hand in hand. Meaning a well-written, well-directed, well-acted
movie like The Thirteenth Floor can fail, simply because it's not breaking
any new ground. And who knows, perhaps Ruznak was aware of this, and thus
made the outer fringes of his simulated world ('the VR-genre') degrade into
lines of light, much like Tron, which had the freedom to create the
conventions as it went along. The characters in The Thirteenth Floor stare
out into that primal, laser-graphed reality with a combination of fear and
desire, as if they wonder what might still be out there. The whole genre is
wondering with them.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
What gets you in a haunted house movie are the quiet moments, when you
expect something to happen. A good haunted house movie incubates this,
stacks up a few false positives, then knocks them down all at once in a
crash of cymbals, only to start the whole process over. Think The Shining,
Amityville, even Poltergeist. Jan de Bont's The Haunting, a liberal remake
of the 1962 Haunting of Hill House, based on the Shirley Jackson novel,
doesn't so much concern itself with this second stage--remounting the
tension. Instead it jacks it up and keeps it there, until the baseline (the
quiet moments) are the moments when only some of the faces on the wall are
tracking a character's progress across a room, down a hall, through one of
the countless thirty-foot tall doors of Hill House. This isn't to say there
isn't escalation, though. More like overload. The place is an absolute
amusement park of horror, the ideal setting for Dr. Marrow (Liam Neeson) to
stage an experiment on fear; he wants to know what use sweaty palms, rapid
heartbeats, pupil dilation and all that have in today's world. His idea is
that they're vestigial responses, of no use anymore. How observing a handful
of insomniacs is supposed to answer his question is a bit murky, though,
which is just as well, as the sweaty palms etc are never given a chance to
redeem themselves. So it goes.
Suffice it to say that the three subjects--homebody Eleanor (Lily Taylor),
bisexual party gal Theo (Catherine-Zeta-Jones), and sardonic Owen (the
intractable Luke Wilson)--walk the halls all night trying to get to the
bottom of the many strange goings-on. Voices, cherubic faces in the
curtains, interdimensional gongs, the whole gamut. And of course no two of
them ever see the same phenomenon simultaneously, which isn't so much a
trick of camerawork as an accepted convention. Where The Haunting departs
from tradition, however, is in the noticeable absence of sexual tension.
Nevermind that Catherine Zeta-Jones is splashed all over the trailer, still
in supermodel shape from Zorro and Entrapment. She's evidently just window
dressing. The one or two token innuendoes (invitations?) her Theo directs
Eleanor's way hardly even register, perhaps because Eleanor--suddenly the
central character--has other things to worry about. Like distinguishing the
scary but good ghosts from the scary and bad ghosts, and how she may or may
not fit into the history of Hill House.
About this scary and bad ghost: aside from being a Scrooge lookalike, he
seems more intent upon frightening Eleanor & Co. to death than upon actually
killing them, which--judging by his insanity level and the power he
wields--would be a short night's work. But then we wouldn't get startled,
right? And The Haunting does startle, something of a feat in itself, taking
into account a slightly jaded audience. It does this by not allowing us to
anticipate the narrative, and it does that by more or less replacing the
narrative with special effects. The same ones introduced with The
Frighteners and abused in The Mummy, both of which fell similarly short on
story but spent a lot of money doing so. Like them, The Haunting is best
seen in the theater, where you can be wowed by sound and lights and not have
time to consider what might be missing.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Instinct (1999)
In comic books, when you go live with the animals for a couple of years you
come back a super-hero; in Instinct, that's half the case: 'Ape-man' Dr.
Ethan Powell (silverback Anthony Hopkins) does come back from the Rwandan
jungle with 'super' powers---an animal ferocity--but, as he's in the land of
men now, society locks him up in a maximum-security prison. Caging the beast
is what civilization's all about, after all. Of course, however, behind bars
is exactly where we like to see Anthony Hopkins, too, simply on the
off-chance that we might get a repeat performance of his Hannibal Lecter
role. And we're not wholly disappointed: to a certain extent, there is some
repetition going on--some of the quid pro quo we know and need--but it's not
so much Silence of the Lambs-derived as it is simply a staple of the
psychiatrist (interviewer, etc) / patient dynamic, as it's been hammered out
in movies like Dead Man Walking, True Crime, or, getting out of maximum
security for a moment, Good Will Hunting and Sixth Sense.
Perhaps most vital to that dynamic, too, is the 'surprise' reversal--that
the doctor's really the patient here, that the patient knows more than the
doctor, has whatever that doctor's been desperately needing. In Instinct,
that doctor is Theo Calder ('Calder' as in caldera, volcanic, intense; Cuba
Gooding, Jr.), a young, ambitious psychiatrist who sets himself the task of
playing Doolittle to the Ape-man--getting Powell to break his Kong-like
silence and talk, talk, talk. It can't be easy, though. Not only does Calder
have to feel his way through Powell's various mental defenses, he also has
to keep one hand free to fend off the prison bureaucracy, which doesn't
really care who gets healed, so long as precious order is maintained. If
this were a crime-movie, the warden and co. would be the police department,
doing everything in their power to keep the honest detective from solving
his case.
As far as set-up goes, all this is fine so far, but the thing with Instinct
is that it never really gets past the set-up stage, never really establishes
some problem that can be somehow resolved at the end of two hours. Which of
course makes it all feel pretty muddled. And yes, Calder's mission to get
Powell to talk is likely meant to be that problem, but A) Powell starts
talking so soon; and B) as far as problems go, this one feels suspiciously
not so much integral to the narrative as integral to the 'movie,' which is
to say Calder's mission becomes simply a contrivance to get Powell's story
on-screen. It is, however--and in spite of the sappy music--a touching story
(Connery's Medicine Man morphing into a latterday Tarzan), but too, if
you've ever seen Bambi you know how these idyllic flashbacks have to end. In
addition, Instinct does have some nice Kurtz-stuff going on, with Powell
leading Calder deeper and deeper into the heart of darkness, but it kind of
gets muted by the Free Willy stuff that eventually comes into play
(releasing the 'animal' back into the wild, etc). And the high points, as
you expect and pay for, are of course everytime Powell goes Ape. Yes,
Hannibal Lecter would likely eat Powell's liver with fava beans, but still,
and in spite of his initial sideshow attraction, Powell is another good
Hopkins performance, if only because he never goes Greystoke--never roars
and sniffs the ladies--and thus Instinct, while occasionally muddled, is
still watchable. And if the Bambi scene doesn't get to you, check your
humanity, you may be running a little low.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Mission to Mars: Houston, we have a problem
Aliens taught us that in space, no one can hear you scream. Mission to Mars
teaches us something a little closer to home: that in the theatre, everyone
can hear you scream. That's about the only fitting response to something
like this, though. Quite simply, Mission to Mars played a lot better as a
trailer--where things don't have to make sense--than full-length. It does
have one cool effects shot (that dust tornado), but other than that it's
just Contact and Total Recall meet 2001 and Sphere at Apollo 13's pad and
sit down to watch some Abyss. And not even the director's version, either.
Not that they pay much attention, anyway . . .
The year is 2020. We know this because the Isuzu's look different. And the
mission is of course that first jump to the red planet. Remember all the
hoopla a year or two back about the 'face' on Mars? It matters here. First,
however, there's months and years of getting there. Though all the time in
between is taken care of with subtitles ("X months later," etc), once the
dialogue starts trying to account for that missing time, it'll feel like
years. Clunky, contrived--the same kind of bad-idea lines Double Jeopardy
required to 'account' for Ashley Judd's time in prison. Mission to Mars
could have seriously benefited from condensing the action down to a day or
two, then presenting the rest out of order. We are a sophisticated audience,
after all; we can make sense, don't need everything laid out in obvious
cause and effect order.
Too, and in large part due to all the forecasting which results from
presenting everything in 1-2-3 fashion, it's not at all difficult to figure
out who's dying here, who's staying where, all that. I mean, even without
Mission to Mars, lots of the developments are clich by now: did the captain
not die in Supernova, in Pitch Black? was it a good idea in Event Horizon to
send a grieving spouse into deep space? In addition, all the warm-fuzzy
parts of Mission to Mars are cloying, to say the least: zero-grav dances,
watching old home movies (per Strange Days), heart-to-hearts with the
director of operations, a wholly ridiculous raising-the-flag scene, all
that. It doesn't help any that these space-shuttles which the crew inhabits
for long long months don't look all that lived in, as Ridley Scott might
have done, but instead look as sterile as ever.
But that face: is it, as the trailer strongly intimates, our alien
ancestors? When we first see it, yes, it does look cool enough to carry us
over all the other already-apparent flaws in the movie. The problem is, it
just doesn't really get any cooler, ever. I mean, yeah, our 'worthy'
survivors here do eventually get inside, but, instead of having that jack up
the action any, it's a long releases of tension. Now we know everyone's
going to be OK. All that's necessary is the movie has to end for fifteen
minutes, fifteen minutes which includes an ill-advised alien (long-finger,
crying, a little too benign?) and a really bad answering-machine joke. And
this is a movie which includes talent like Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Armin
Mueller-Stahl? Regrettably, yes. To their credit, their performances are of
course nothing less than we'd expect, it's just that what they're performing
is perhaps the weakest space-movie to come along in a while. Including the
direct-to-video slasher-in-space stuff. The one good thing about Mission to
Mars is that DePalma finally rolls the credits at some arbitrary point, and
you can leave. If you were careful, too, your fond memories of 2001 will
still be intact. Mission to Mars is forgettable enough that that shouldn't
be a problem.
(c)2000 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
American Pie: the last american virgin
In Happiness everything revolved around a young boy's ejaculation, and we
all kind of looked away and accepted it. In American Pie, happiness is
ejaculation, only now there are enough puerile body fluid jokes that we
can't look away. Too, though, the trailer didn't mislead us. With a logline
like 'There's something about your first piece' and a title as suggestive as
'American Pie,' we have a pretty good idea what the movie's going to be
about--getting some--which is of course hardly pioneer country for the
hormone-charged teen flick. What is new ground, however, is getting caught
in flagrante delicto with the pastry, which both adds a little something to
the title and takes a little something away from afterdinner dessert.
But there are people in the movie, too, don't forget. Specifically, four
high school guys--Jim (Jason Biggs), Kevin (Thomas Ian Nicholas), Finch
(Eddie Kaye Thomas), and Chris (Chris Klein)--virgins all, but not for a
lack of trying. They are well-practiced though, should the need ever arise
to prove themselves. And they do have lots of sure-fire schemes for scoring,
all of which get launched three weeks before prom, when they make a
Seinfeld-ish pact to get some either by or on prom night, which supplies the
deadline these kinds of movie depend upon. Which is to say it allows a lot
of comic foreplay before the big night.
But of course they big night can't be only about sex, either, but instead
has to function as a collective disillusionment, an awakening to the fact
that sex isn't quite as important as they've been fantasizing it was. Well,
this is how it works for two of the four, anyway. For the other two, their
illusions are simply reinforced. Fifty percent's better than no percent,
though, and isn't really all that bad for a movie where everybody's playing
18 and under. And there are some good lines, the best of which is maybe from
Kevin, the most likeable of the lot, trying to defend himself against his
girlfriend: "It's not always about sex. I just though it was about sex this
time."
The teen movie works best when the characters get lines like these, which,
instead of speaking to the individual issues and concerns of a single teen,
speaks for all teens. Which is to say it's bland and vague and wry enough
that it applies to all, leaves no one out. And high school is of course
about not being left out. That's more or less what Breakfast Club was about,
yes? How similar we all are minus the social veneer? American Pie is no
Breakfast Club, though--or Ridgemont High or Grease or Say Anything, either.
It does play some token Simple Minds at the prom, however, but that's a
gimme, just necessary homage. As are all the variations on Damone's
time-honored tricks ('play side 2 of Led Zeppelin IV,' etc). No, American
Pie, while entertaining, doesn't quite have the resonance of the Breakfast
Clubs we know and love. It's more of a She's All That, with a little
Stewardess School thrown in for good measure. Just be happy that Jim--our
pieboy here--lives in a house without pets. It could have been a wholly
different movie, then.
(c) 1999, Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
The World is Not Enough: shaken, stirred, but never whipped
In of the trademark opening stunts of The World is Not Enough, James Bond
(Pierce Brosnan) rides a rope and a prayer down like ten sheer stories, sets
down lightly into the bemused sidewalk traffic, then accidentally catches
the eye of a passerby. What we expect at this point is one of his signature
lines to diffuse the situation--'Elevator was out' or something of that
brand, something wry and John McLane-ish, downplaying whatever just went on
(normalizing it, so he can re-enter the 'normal' world). But, instead of
delivering that line in late-Bond (Roger Moore +) fashion, this Bond
resists, just walks away, becoming part of the crowd as a good espionage
agent should, which intimates early on that maybe we're finally coming full
circle, getting back to the Connery-bonds, the ones everyone nostalgically
remembers as 'pure,' undecadent, (Kirk vs. Picard) when intrigue was still
more primal to the story than special effects, resourcefulness still more
impressive than gadgetry.
Not that this James Bond isn't resourceful in the face of danger, as he
establishes time and again, against wave after wave of videogame bad guy.
And The World is Not Enough does have more story to it than any Bond to come
along in awhile. It's just that, instead of continuing to resist that
'irresistable' line as he does at first, Bond takes the easy way out the
rest of the movie, even going so far as to provoke a few groans of
embarrassment here and there.
As for the story, though, it is strong, does do what we like to have
done--putting Bond on the defensive. And, as the trailer gives away, this
time it's personal, the problem is in-house. M (Judi Dench) even gets
kidnapped. And, returning to the Moore-era, this time we even have a
'more-than-human' bad guy (Robert Carlyle). What's particularly refreshing,
too, is that the bad guys' motives aren't as generic as taking over the
world, holding it hostage, exacting some poetic revenge, etc. They just want
to get filthy rich. And with oil, at that (as opposed to diamonds, diamonds
in space, etc). And of course there's all the rampant womanizing we expect,
along with the names--Elektra King (as in Agememnon and crowd, yes; Sophie
Marceau) and Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards), the latter of which
provides Bond with more quip-opportunities than one secret agent should ever
have to deal with.
There are some touching moments, too, though, unexpectedly. Well, two: the
first is a little farewell to Q (Desmond Llewelyn), which takes the form of
a torch-passing ceremony to the 'new' Q--a bumbling R (John Cleese). The
other 'touching' moment is late in the movie, when M accidentally sees Bond
using his famed license to kill, in cold blood. It's a rare moment in the
007 series, to have the brutality of what's going on register on someone's
face. The thing is, though, it's left at that, not followed through.
Granted, in a series this certain of another episode, you can span two years
waiting for a response, but still, it would have been nice to have a little
closure on it now. At least a nod of acknowledgment from one of the primary
players, something. As it is, though, the Fleming/Broccoli-formula
effectively subverts any of that, and neatly spits Bond and his buxom
sidekick out into yet another variation of the lifeboat on the ocean, to do
what they do best. He deserves it after saving the world, right? It's not
all about Queen and country . . .
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Any Given Sunday: all the longest yards
Any Given Sunday opens tight on the ball, pre-snap, and if it wasn't in
widescreen we might think it's really just Sunday afternoon again. But then
there's the tribal music pounding in, which, along with all the fancy
camerawork, is a giveaway that this is Oliver Stone football. Meaning lots
of stylized slow-motion and upbeat sounds, working contrapuntally to lend a
little magic to the gridiron. It's the same kind of opening Speilberg uses
with Saving Private Ryan, where we're on the beaches of Normandy for the
first twenty-five minutes or so, getting lost in the battle, (i.e.,
acclimatized to WWII) only here the battle is between men wearing regulation
pads, coaches chewing high-blood pressure meds like candy. It lasts just as
long as Spielberg's Normandy, though, if not longer, and, as that opening
game is rendered so well, so indulgently, our critical faculties are dulled
the littlest bit, just enough to where we won't necessarily question all
that comes after. It's a common trick, (Ludivico Treatment, yes) though only
the big-name directors seem to have enough pull with the studios to get away
with it. The rest have to do as The Last Boy Scout does, and try to compress
it all into one five-minute sequence. Which results in things like Billy
Cole using a pistol on the playing field, which, yes, illustrates the kinds
of pressure these guys are under quite effectively, but at the cost of other
things best not sacrificed.
Once things get started with Any Given Sunday, however--and in spite of all
the camerawork--it's all pigskins and dollar signs, (and cameos) or, better
yet, the friction between pigskins and dollar signs. As Coach D'Amato
(Pacino, still hoarse from The Insider) says, football irrevocably changed
the first time a time-out was called for a commercial. As he sees it, TV is
killing the game, but then, too, the game he's talking about is the game of
his youth, all tinted with Lombardian nostalgia, 'pure,' not at all the same
game his third-string 'star' quarterback Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx) is
playing, which caters to the cameras. As any good hero must be, too, he's
more or less alone in his thinking: neither do his players seem to agree
with him, nor does his boss, hard-driving owner Christina Pagniacci (Cameron
Diaz). Yet he's got a season to win. And if that wasn't enough stacked
against him, he also seems to be dealing with it in all the generic
self-destructive ways (bourbon, Elizabeth Berkley).
And yes, his dilemma is the crux of the movie upon which everything else
turns, but to understand it you have to look away from him, not to Jerry
Maguire or Love of the Game or any of the other sports-type vehicles, but
deeper into Any Given Sunday itself, the minor characters whom Stone uses
very effectively, for a change. Specifically, the little dynamic going on
between Dr. Mandrake (James Woods) and Dr. Powers (Matthew Modine), a
dynamic wherein the younger slowly becomes the older, in spite of his
efforts not to. Stone just slips this in as if it's happenstance, filler,
but it's anything but: instead of just distracting us for a few moments with
good acting (Woods and Modine) or venting the tension of the previous scene
or anything like that, the Mandrake/Powers dynamic presents in its barest
terms what's fundamentally going on in the rest of Any Given Sunday: the
ritual torch-passing. This is Stone, after all; ritual does comes first,
last, and in the middle. And not just for Mandrake and Powers, but for
Pagniacci and her dead father; for Beaman and aging quarterback Cap Rooney
(Everybody's All American Dennis Quaid, still making faces like Doc
Holliday); and last, for D'Amato and his idol, the venerable Vince Lombardi.
Everybody's slowly (170 min.) turning into someone else, on-screen, and, to
Stone's credit, it works, though it might have worked better without the
redemptive coda. But so be it. At least Any Given Sunday never falls into
the pit of hero worship, never tries to deal head-on with the social issues
involved with gladiator sports. And yes, it is a seriously long movie, but
it had to be, too. Otherwise all the music wouldn't have fit.

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Man on the Moon's big draw isn't Andy Kaufman. That would be too big a
gamble, as his comedy takes a refined sense of humor to appreciate, to say
the least. Likely, Milos Forman was aware of this, so he tried to shift
things ever so slightly, away from Andy Kaufman, to the legend of Andy
Kaufman. America did love Eddie and the Cruisers, after all, which was all
about legend. And of course--talking pop recognition--Taxi is nearly as much
a part of our sitcom-reality as M*A*S*H or Cheers, meaning Latka is already
a familiar character. The bad thing is, though, without the prompting of Man
on the Moon's trailer, the bigger part of today's audience wouldn't have
known it was Andy Kaufman in those shuffling white coveralls and the thick
accent. Meaning he's only achieved 'legendary' status for a select few. So,
in spite of what Milos Forman might be trying to do here, the big draw of
Man on the Moon finally isn't Kaufman-related or even Jim Carrey-related,
but Forman-related: we go on the chance that he's cooked up another Cuckoo's
Nest, another Amadeus, something like Larry Flynt.
And for a while, too, it seems he has. First of course there's Jim Carrey as
Andy Kaufman, likely one of the few actors who could have captured Kaufman's
body language and diction so precisely. Second there's all the nostalgia
involved with getting the old Taxi cast back together again for a few scenes
(though Danny DeVito's presence as George Shapiro is a little disorienting
at first). Third, there's the opening, which functions both as a timid
disclaimer (accuracy vs. dramatic necessity) and adds a little meta-dialogue
to the mix. Same kind of stuff you get in Private Parts, only this is Milos
Forman, thus it's all done just a little better. Unlike Private Parts,
however, we don't mire around in childhood too long, but cut quickly out of
it, to Kaufman's career, which of course functions as something of a
biographical lens: nevermind the 'draw' of Man on the Moon--once we're
there, the focus for Forman is the intriguingly inconsistent (tender,
self-destructive, etc) character of Andy Kaufman. The idea is that Man on
the Moon will explain why a man would wreck his career by wrestling with
women, will get to the bottom of the whole Tony Clifton thing, will do with
a person what Cronenberg did with reality in eXistenZ: layer it to the point
where you don't know what's real, to the point where you can't tease Kaufman
away from his comic personas.
Which is to say Forman gets us to initially ask those questions, to be
interested in the real Kaufman even if we don't think he's funny, which is
no small feat. But then he takes it just a little further, sets Man on the
Moon up so that we're willing to trade in those answers we so want if Andy
Kaufman can just make it out alive somehow, in the movie version (the 1995
Scarlet Letter tack). Inaccurate as Man on the Moon self-consciously claims
to be, though, it doesn't go quite so far as to change the documented facts,
which, while respectable, also introduces some dramatic weakness (see
Insider for more like this). Thing is, right at the point when we need to
think Kaufman might pull through, we already know he's many years gone.
Which siphons a lot of the tension out of it all. Granted, Forman does muddy
the waters up some, (some of that dramatic license) which does make the
closing frames quite beautiful, but too, they may just be beautiful in
comparison to the thirty-odd minutes that preceded it. Too, however, this is
a problem endemic to all historically-based movies; it's not just local to
Man on the Moon. And there is a way out: you simply have to make all the
documented facts hinge upon the in-between parts you make up, which is where
Forman stumbles a bit. Yes, he does take a different slant on the
Kaufman-Lawler fiasco and various other things, but rather than pushing the
drama ahead, they explain what just went on. So, yes, there is some marked
dramatic weakness to Man on the Moon, but still, it is Andy Kaufman on the
big screen at last. Perhaps some oversight is excusable. And who knows,
maybe Andy would have even wanted it this way.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
The trick in a movie with a title like Love of the Game is to, by the end of
the movie, redefine 'game' so that it refers not so much to sports but to
the main character's life situation. Thus winning or losing the game means a
little more. It's a common enough trick, from Rocky to Happy Gilmore to
Varsity Blues. Or, talking Kevin Costner, Tin Cup. Which is to say Love of
the Game is, as the title also suggests, a love story, or, more
specifically, a love triangle--aging superstar Billy Chapel (Costner),
freelance writer Jane Aubrey (Kelly Preston), and America's favorite
already-romanticized (Field of Dreams) past-time.
None of this is unexpected. What is a surprise, though--for those who didn't
read Michael Shaara's novel--is how Love of the Game isn't structured over
the length of a season, as with Bull Durham, but instead uses the last game
of Billy Chapel's season as a springboard into everything that's gone
before. Meaning yes, the bulk of the movie happens in the movie's past. It's
all flashbacks, occasioned by pained expressions from the dugout, reached
through soft dissolves, all that, which has the effect of gradually making
this 'last' game more and more important. Or, of making us realize how
important it is. Which is all good and fine.
The problem with non-linear approaches like this, however, is that--unless
every flashback is both a surprise and absolutely necessary narrative
exposition, qua Tarrantino--it can get old real fast. As in repetitive. As
in every scar and every comment has an explanation. In Love of the Game,
they're all explained, which is a little bit of overkill. And you can tell
when the explanations are coming, too, which doesn't help any, and doesn't
do anything to subtract from the occasionally nauseous levels of nostalgia
already circulating. But then it a movie about baseball. And it is Kevin
Costner.
And it is--in spite of all this 'ghosts of Christmas past' feel--a
dramatically sound movie: the 'story of them' (Billy Chapel and Jane Aubrey)
is a strong little story, with no real bad guys, lots of bad luck, all the
things we've liked since When Harry Met Sally, Forget Paris, all those. And
this 'story of them' does catch up with the present-story very nicely (see:
without intruding), in a way that gives us no real choice but to care,
to--as with any date-movie--beg for the happy ending. However, unlike most
date movies, Love of the Game doesn't wholly give itself away until the
closing frames.
But of course Billy and Jane aren't the only two characters here in search
of restoration. Everyone in the movie wants to be redeemed, and, like
dominos, they more or less are, which is a little too picture-perfect for
comfort. Which isn't to say you're not happy for the minor characters when
they get 'redeemed,' it just feels a little cheap immediately afterwards.
Perhaps it's meant to be all about the moment, though, in which case it's a
success.
The thing is, though, there are so many moments, better than two hours of
them. Which would be fine is Love of the Game were epic in scope, like, say,
Dances with Wolves, Waterworld, orThe Postman, but it's not. Or, it tries
hard to be more sweeping than it is. Meaning it's a little inflated. And
this simply because every picture in it has a story. But so be it. It is
satisfying in other ways. There is a definite Unforgiven-feel, of the aging
hero proving himself in high style, which America so loves. And there is a
seriously magical moment when director Sam Raimi cues Bob Seger when Bob
Seger is exactly what's needed, which manages to keep us from dismissing the
rest of the movie, on the off-chance that there might be another magical
moment like that, more chances to cry. Love of the Game is full of them.
(c) 1999  Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Mystery, Alaska (1999)
In 1976 Rocky said it once and for all: "I can't beat him. But that don't
bother me. The only thing I want to do is to go the distance, that's all."
The determined underdog, the noble nobody, the champion-in-waiting. These
are the things we love. Mystery, Alaska (re)delivers them, packaged nicely
in snow and isolation and every episode of Northern Exposure. Which isn't at
all a drawback: Northern Exposure had some strong writing. Refreshingly, so
does Mystery, Alaska, though of course it does--as the genre demands--dabble
the slightest bit in hero-making. But so be it. Heroism and sports are
synonymous in the American conscience. As are the Mighty Ducks and hockey.
And, not unlike Mighty Ducks, it does all come down to that one final
game--locals vs. the professionals--and it's all balanced such that
individual victories and team victories are interdependent, and there are
all the necessary enthematic rallies in the halftime locker room ('you've
got the rest of your lives,' etc), but, in spite of all these predictable
developments, Mystery, Alaska manages to set itself apart. Or, slightly
above.
This is due largely to Russell Crowe as John Biebe, the aging Sheriff
who--in the space of what has to be the most condensed 24 hours Mystery's
ever seen--gets bumped off the local hockey team, has to arrest one of his
players on shooting charges, and is called to investigate a 'mysterious'
helicopter carrying his wife's old flame Charles Danner (Hank Azaria) back
into town. Danner is of course bringing the news we already know from the
trailer: that the New York Rangers are coming to town. Soon enough
everything and everyone's in motion, preparing, anticipating, etc. Everyone
except Judge Burns (Burt Reynolds), that is, the pessimistic voice of reason
here. But he gets very little screentime, too, which makes it easy to get
caught up in the fervor of this small town attempting to prove itself
to/against the big city, which is nicely carried out on an individual level,
with Sheriff Biebe, who has to similarly prove himself to the town council
(who for some strange reason decide who gets to play in the weekly games).
But Crowe doesn't carry the movie himself. Mary McCormack as Donna Biebe is
the real show-stealer, in an understated way. And of course Skank (Ron
Eldard, with some good sitcom training) provides enough philandering humor
that things never get boring. They do however, get a little contrived in a
couple of places. The first of these is a court trial that, for a
legally-hip audience, either rings a bit false or isn't quite Liar Liar-ish
enough to mute our critical faculties. The second contrivance is the
so-called low point of the narrative, when all the characters are
simultaneously and conveniently hit with something from which it seems they
surely won't be able to recover. In addition, there's a strange little
teenage romance going on between the Judge's daughter and Stevie, the new
team star, a relationship which seems to have been written in largely for
comic effect, as it has no real relevance to the rest of the movie. It is
funny, though, and does make room for the best line of the movie, to the
Judge, from his wife, about his daughter's sex life, in response to his
question about what they're talking about without him: "If you don't leave
[the room] right now, I swear I'll tell you."
The Judge wisely backs out of the room, and Burt Reynolds is all hat-tipping
Bandit as he does.
What's nice about Mystery, Alaska are those kind of moments, where you
forget you're in a sports-movie and begin to suspect you might be getting
caught up in some of this small town drama, the lives of these characters
which are supposed to be just padding for the slow-motion action sequences.
Yes, though, in the end Mystery, Alaska is just Hoosiers on ice, but all the
same, Hoosiers was a good movie. Mystery, Alaska could have done far worse
for a role model.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com/

Title
Review for Astronaut's Wife, The (1999)
The X-Files taught us that alien colonization won't be loud like
Independence Day, but insipient, like Body Snatchers, Puppet Masters, all
that. More They Live than War of the the Worlds. The trailer establishes all
this with minimal effort, too, as it's already conventional knowledge. And
we are hungry for it, or something like it. It's been two summers now since
Contact made the aliens benevolent, paternal, essentially erasing the
(ir-)rational fear of the Alien series. Which is to say it's high time to
give those aliens fangs again. The Astronaut's Wife does just that.
Or, to be more specific, it gives NASA pilot Spencer Armacost ('Texan'
Johnny Depp, a long way from 21 Jumpstreet, bit closer to Elm) fangs, via a
low-orbit close encounter. And of course no one can see those fangs for most
of the movie. His wife Jillian (Charlize Thiron) has her suspicions, but,
luckily for Spencer, Jillian is an ex-mental patient, so is thus easy to
convince that it's all hallucination and paranoia brought on by her
pregnancy. And there's even the suggestion that it might all just be
paranoia. But then there wouldn't be any special effects. To writer/director
Rand Ravich's credit, however, he is able to milk a lot of tension from an
otherwise subdued movie by keeping the range of Spencer's suprahuman
abilities more or less under wraps until the closing frames, a bit of
dramatically-effective concealment.
But Spencer's not the title-character here. Jillian is. Along with their
marriage, which is so ideal for the first few minutes that it has to be
doomed ('unmade in heaven'). This is something of a non-traditional
approach, though, putting the wife--the ostensible victim here--in the
leading role. Typically, it's the alien's pursuer who gets the screentime,
which gives the movie license to use all the cop/criminal conventions in
space etc, but The Astronaut's Wife isn't Predator, is a bit more low-key
than that. Which is to say it has to rely on a whole nother set of
conventions. Specifically, those Polanski hammered out once and for all with
Rosemary's Baby. Chereze Thiron even has a schoolboy Mia Farrow haircut and
a husband who spends his days at the office. And everyone who shares her
suspicions is summarily removed. It's all about isolation. The only
difference is that instead of giving birth to the supernatural, Jillian may
be giving birth to the extraterrestrial. Not the 2001 kind of
extraterrestrial, though, but something less the benign-infant, more our
replacement. Again, it's how aliens get a terrestrial foothold:
hybridization. And don't think Starman here. Think Species.
Jillian does. But too, she has a little more of that final-girl resolve than
Rosemary did. Very Jamie Lee Curtis, except instead of intense action and
longindying screams we get intense dialogue and longindying stares. Which is
a bit of a change. The stand-off as opposed to the shoot-em-up. This is a
drama, after all, nevermind the alien overtones. It's about trust in
marriage, what the breakover point is. What will convince Jillian she's not
losing it, that Spencer is in fact listening to the coded-static radio
transmissions we know from Contact, Arrival. And it's all fairly strong up
until then, until her convincing. And then, inside of two minutes, it simply
falls apart, uses the same cheap trick Fallen used to 'surprise' us in the
closing frames. And the thing is, there was such a better ending within
reach. In all The Thing incarnations there's always the distinct possibility
early on that these people have just been cooped up too long. Instead of
expanding on that, using it for the ending, The Astronaut's Wife takes the
easy way out, the grand way out, the Hollywood way out. Shoots for the
disturbing Twilight Zone ending and doesn't quite make escape velocity, has
to settle for the typical, when it had the potential to be so much more.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
The most successful use of the messiah-figure in movie-land so far has to be
Star Wars, where young Luke 'redeems' that far away galaxy. And of course
the narrative arc associated with the messianic character is the monomythic
cycle, per Joseph Campbell, whom Lucas supposedly read heavily. Meaning Star
Wars was no accident (i.e., was already ingrained into our cultural
unconscious). Neither is the Wachowski brothers' (Andy & Larry, best know
for Bound) The Matrix, which, instead of picking and choosing from the
monomyth per Lucas, instead just uses it all, from the 'parentless' birth to
the prophesied appearance to the ability to transcend reality. The messiah
here even dies and gets reborn, which means, yes, this has all been done
before. Thing is, though, it's never been visually-realized so well, from
the opening frame on.
It all starts with a nifty little showcase of the Gap-commercial camerawork
we know from the trailer, which provides perhaps the best opening-action
sequence around, counting Bond. The woman in black is Trinity (sci-fi newbie
Carrie-Anne Moss), and, while the special effects do get all the attention,
they also serve a second purpose: to make us wonder just how she can pull
them off. Meaning there's already a question to be answered, a mystery to be
solved, which in narrative terms translates as a compelling reason to move
forward. By the end of that opening sequence, we're hooked. And it only gets
better (or, the mystery, as all good mysteries must, only deepens).
Cut now to Neo (Keanu Reeves, already at home in the sci-fi future, via
Johnny Mnemonic, even Bill & Ted), our messiah, a cubicle-sitter by day,
minor league computer hacker by night. It's his night job where he really
lives, where he hears whisperings of the 'Matrix,' and some shadowy
terrorist figure called Morpheus (sci-fi veteran Laurence Fishburne). But
whisperings aren't enough: like Kirstun Dunst in Interview with the Vampire,
he wants some more. Soon enough he gets it, gets pulled into answering the
mind-bending question Donald Sutherland asked a long time ago in Body
Snatchers: What if this world is just nested in another world, which is
nested in another world, and on and on? He's introduced to the
question--introduced to the 'Matrix'--by none other than Morpheus, who
dresses it all up like a Through the Looking Glass experience. You almost
expect Grace Slick to punctuate the background for us some, but the
Wachowski bros. are able to reel it all in nicely, put the white rabbit on
someone's arm instead of onto the soundtrack. It all makes sense if you pay
just a little attention.
Once you're in on the secret then, (real, or Memorex?) everything shifts
into overdrive. Lots of spaghetti-western hero shots, with Neo's overcoat
whipping dramatically (see Cage in Face-Off for more shots like this). Lots
of gunplay and techtalk. Lots of stepping into and out of realities, per
Millennium (1989) or 12 Monkeys. Even a little romance. The Matrix simply
has it all, and then some; you'll want to see it twice, at least. And yes,
it does get a little gun-heavy for a while, but this is an action film,
after all. Slow-motion leadslinging is part of the package. And the spent
cartridges never quite rise above story-level, anyway, but not so much
because there's not a lot of cartridges to spend, but simply because there's
so much story there in the first place. That is what drew us to Star Wars,
after all, yes? The Matrix, though not a space opera, is just as good, and
has the added bonus of updated effects technology. The only place Star Wars
might have a clear advantage, really, is that Lucas didn't tack an
unnecessary coda on, where the Wachowski bros did. Minus those four or five
seconds at the end, however, The Matrix is the best sci-fi to come along
since Bladerunner. Just a lot louder.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
Being John Malkovich: alice in hollywood
The test of a fantastic story is whether or not you can interpret it in such
a way that all the 'fantastic' stuff comes out as projected material--some
character's internal world being presented as external. Think Fisher King.
To look at it another way, if you strip off all the fantastic elements,
there should still be a story there we can somehow relate to, make sense of,
etc. All of which comes down to the big question: are the fantastic elements
really necessary? Could Fisher King have been presented in any other way and
still have been as effective? Unlikely. The same goes for Spike Jonze's
Being John Malkovich, a movie which casually asks us to accept that there
might be 'corridors' you can stumble upon which allow temporary access into
another person's mind.
And, in our hero Craig Schwarz' (John Cusack) case, not just any mind, but
one with a face we all know: John Malkovich (John Malkovich). Craig
discovers this corridor when he hires on as file clerk for a company
stationed on the mythical 7th floor of a major office building, a floor
which logically shouldn't exist, which is our cue that there's going to be
some serious make-believe going on here. Before Craig even gets to the 7th
floor, though, we already know that: can a struggling puppeteer whose wife
takes the family chimp to psychotherapy even have an ordinary adventure? Of
course not. So when we see him crouching his way down the diminutive halls
of his new workplace, dodging the 105-year old lecherous boss (Orson Bean),
exchanging banter with the speech-impeded secretary, it's hardly a surprise.
Or, the surprise is that Being John Malkovich is going further than most
comedies, isn't settling for the traditional quirky character in a sane
world (Don Quixote) or vice-versa (Brazil), but is instead creating
characters who are quirky because that's the only sane response to a
fundamentally quirky world.
It's about survival, which, for Craig, is immediately identified with
romancing cold-shouldered co-worker Maxine (Catherine Keener), which is
another thing Being John Malkovich casually asks us to accept, or rather,
doesn't really bother to explain. But so be it. She is beautiful, and
'other,' and without pets, so maybe that's all a comedy needs in the way of
justification. After all, this is a movie where a chimpanzee has a flashback
with English subtitles; compared to this, any honest character motivations
would appear minor. And in comedy the focus is always on end results,
anyway, not causes. Causes don't make us laugh; results do. They're the
punchlines. And Being John Malkovich has enough to go around, from selling
tickets to John Malkovich's head ($200 for 15 min. of fame) to the highly
inventive love triangle that Craig and Maxine and Lotte (Craig's wife, a
brunette Cameron Diaz) find themselves in, with the body of John Malkovich
in there somewhere too, unwittingly at first, unwillingly as things
progress.
In the midst of all this, too--at the core of the movie--Craig's getting to
live out every puppeteer's primal fantasy: to be inside the skin of someone
else, which of course is inconsiderate enough that it eventualy has to
backfire, give him an opportunity to learn, occasionally despair, etc. But
it's an entertaining ride while it lasts--Faust with the headlights off. And
does it all work if we take this 'corridor' to function as Craig's
projection? Yes. One way of looking at it is simply as the story of two
people drifting inexorably apart, only one of them is actively trying to
slow things down with a (Schehezeradean) story that eventually spools out of
his control, leaving him stranded first on the New Jersey turnpike, next
somewhere even more unexpected. Another way of looking at is as the most
inventive movie in a long while, one of the few that can string together an
extended series of wholly implausible What Ifs into a marginally coherent
narrative.
And if that's not enough, Being John Malkovich also has the bar-none best
cameo ever: Charlie Sheen as Charlie Sheen, talking about lesbian witches
and how the truth is for suckers, a tall drink in his hand the whole time, a
telling smirk on his face that simply won't go away. The only other movie
this year that can possibly compare with Being John Malkovich would have to
be American Beauty, but that's all the way in the suburbs, leaving Being
John Malkovich in a class of its own. There's simply nothing else quite like
it. It's like finding your own little corridor which opens onto a whole new
world of movie-making, where the rules of mainstream don't hold. Stay as
long as you can.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
When we think stadium rock the kneejerk association is the decadent
hairbands of the 80's. But there was a time when it was more pure. Or, less
pure, but in a more original way. The time is 1978. The band is KISS. The
place is director Adam Rifkin's Detroit Rock City, temporary mecca for
MyStery, a KISS-tribute band made up of Jam (Sam Huntington), Hawk (Edward
Furlong), Trip (James DeBello), and Lex (Giuseppe Andrews), skipping school
and driving in from Cleveland on borrowed wheels and stolen time. Just four
guys on what for them is a pilgrimage, with all the necessary pitfalls,
pratfalls, obstacles, etc to make it interesting. To make it seem like they
won't make it, that this will be 'that' kind of coming-of-age movie.
Refreshingly, it's not that kind of movie.
Instead, it's the kind of movie with a soundtrack, maybe the best since
Robert Alt's Dazed and Confused. And yes, Detroit Rock City toys with some
of the same torch-passing type of generational material as Dazed and
Confused, but in a significantly less introspective manner than Alt. Which
gives it the freedom to go overboard, to have an overweight Elvis security
guard chase this KISS-tribute band into the future, a little retrospective
allegory we can all appreciate via dramatic irony: we know how the music
wars went. We know that KISS is in facepaint again and nobody has Saturday
Night Fever anymore.
All the same though, Detroit Rock City isn't just a movie for the faithful.
Instead of writing it for the heavy metal equivalent of the snickering
in-group Star Trek: Insurrection appealed to--and thus relying solely on the
nostalgic appeal of a mythic KISS concert to propel things--writer Carl V.
Dupre chose instead to make the concert's importance proportional with the
obstacles MyStery has to deal with to get to that concert. And, as they're
big issues, especially for Jam, having to deal with his MATMOK (Mothers
Against The Music Of Kiss) mother, the concert is important, even pivotal.
In case this isn't enough, though, Dupre also has a back-up structure: this
is Jam's last night of freedom before two years of boarding school. Which is
to say tonight they're going to let it all hang out, even dancing at a male
strip club for ticket money.
Which is where Shannon Tweed has her big cameo, playing Sylvia again from
Hot Dog, coolly oblivious to the 15 years between then and now, but still in
full possession of the camera. And then of course there's Paul and Gene and
Ace and Peter, playing themselves on stage, still breathing fire and
spitting blood. There's even a strange little shot of the audience from the
POV of Gene Simmons' throat, down along his legendary cow-tongue, which is
perhaps the one moment when the Detroit Rock City goes a little far. As for
the rest of it, though, just be satisfied that it's not Phantom in the Park.
It's 1999 now. Suddenly the devil's music is in DTS.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Resurrection (1999/I)
As all good serial killer movies must, Resurrection opens on the scene of
the crime, which fosters the necessary illusion that we're starting at the
same place the detective is: with a mangled body from which we / he have to
reconstruct the crime, which will in turn identify the criminal. That's the
basic formula, tried and true till it's black and blue. Typically, too, the
figure of the 'detective' gets split in two, simply because the role entails
so much and the buddy-cop dynamic is so easy; it supplies the banter that
gets us through the slow parts, all the forensic slogging the modern
audience demands. Resurrection starts out this way--with bad attitude
homicide detective John Prudhomme (a hardboiled Cajun Christopher Lambert)
paired up with the amicable Andy (Leland Orser)--but soon enough that's
abandoned, and it's Prudhomme fighting the serial killer alone.
And this is no run of the mill serial killer, concerned solely with body
count. No, this one has a mission. That first body Resurrection opens on,
after all, has the right arm missing, from which Prudhomme is instantly able
to mumble in his best Morgan Freeman that there'll be more. There is, and it
soon becomes evident that this serial killer is collecting body parts, doing
the Frankenhooker thing. But to what end? Director Russell Mulcahy isn't
worried about keeping that secret long: the serial killer is justifying the
title ("Resurrection")--putting Jesus back together, which will, through
some Silence of the Lambs stuff, supposedly teach society some se7en-ish
lesson. Which is to say writer Brad Mirman is trying to build something
himself here, only he's using other movies. But does it dance, though,
right?
Surprisingly, yes, and even better than some of the pretenders (Kiss the
Girls, Copycat, etc). And this is largely because A) there's some real
tension about who the killer's going to turn out to be--though you will
likely guess it; and B) the killer has a mask which should be standard-issue
for any would-be serial killer, a Michael Myers affair, but one that shows
even less emotion somehow, or, reduces the human visage to twin eyeholes and
a slit mouth, which is to say it effectively erases the serial killer's
humanity. Which is disturbing.
To make up for this lack of humanity--i.e., to further show how our hero is
the perfect inverse of the serial killer--Resurrection makes the obligatory
nod towards establishing Detective Prudhomme as very human. And 'human' here
is defined as having marital problems which stem from the death of a child,
who dies in a manner so graphic you really want to look away. Think Gabe in
Jacob's Ladder, Gage in Pet Semetery, the kid in Shortcuts. It's bad, and
on-screen. Of course, too, structurally speaking, the serial killer and
Prudhomme are also engaged in similar activities: just as the serial killer
is piecing something together, so is Prudhomme--his life. Meaning the title
applies to him as well . . .
The serial killer, however, is much more meticulous about it, elaborately
staging his crime scenes, manipulating Prudhomme and Co. like puppets, which
suggests that, as narrative reversal goes, he'll be defeated by some swift
counter-manipulation. Regrettably enough, that isn't the case. Instead of
beating the serial killer at his own game, Prudhomme instead has to beat him
with fighting prowess, (this is the Highlander crowd, after all) his
lightning quick reflexes, all that. Which would have been a not-bad place to
wrap things up; a proper denouement doesn't have to address every thread,
after all. In Resurrection, though, it does. And it takes a while, requires
not one fade-out but two, which results in something like overkill. And the
bad thing is, David Cronenberg was presumably on-set (as Prudhomme's
priest), to warn them away from this mistake. But so be it. Even though it
evidently wasn't fit enough to open in American theatres, Resurrection is
still one of the stronger serial killer movies, if only because it dares to
have as its set piece one of the more sacrilegious images around.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Muse, The (1999)
Through Get Shorty we learned that to make it in Hollywood, you have to be
not of Hollywood. That way all your 'foreign' methods of doing things will
be just new enough to work. The west coast was a cakewalk for Chili Palmer
and his in your face, loan-shark approach. It's similarly easy for Sarah
Little (Sharon Stone), the muse of Albert Brooks' The Muse, not to be
confused with Mighty Aphrodite, though the reflective brand of humor in both
targets more or less the same audience and both are organized around the
continual dilemmas of a neurotic/sardonic male lead and his associations
with a mysterious women. Unlike Mighty Aphrodite, however, this is LA,
meaning that Lorenzo Lamas is in the diner, Rob Reiner's at the aquarium,
James Cameron is at the doorstep, Martin Scorcese's desperately seeking
Starbuck's. As in The Player, too, this long string of cameos is just part
of the behind-the-scenes- of-Hollywood Hollywood movie, pulling back the
curtain on the machinery which makes the magic.
What The Muse does to that machine, though, is make it magic as well. Sarah
Little claims to be the daughter of Zeus, you see. Which makes her
significantly more foreign than Chili Palmer (Olympia vs. Florida). And more
than claims: she has all the big-name producers and directors at her beck
and call, everyone dependent upon her for inspiration. Enter
'past-his-prime' screenwriter Steven Phillips, (Albert Brooks, same
character as always, different name) just let go by a major studio because
he's supposedly lost his edge. Edge or no, though, he has a family to
support, meaning soon enough he's just desperate enough to believe in
earthly deities, divine manifestations, whatever it takes to get his 'edge'
back, make him a commodity again.
The thing is, though--as he finds out--muses are high-maintenance, requiring
ideal conditions to sleep, midnight salads, spontaneous daytrips, limousines
etc, all of which harry Steven to the point of exhaustion, strain his
marriage in the usual, comical ways, all that. Which is satisfying. To add
to the mix he even has an advisor, Jack (Jeff Bridges, not playing Jeff
Bridges, which, in a cameo-heavy show, is initially confusing), who's also
dependent on Sarah for inspiration. In a movie founded in myth, though, of
course the main character will have an advisor. And of course Jeff Bridges
pulls it off with grace; his tennis-serving scene is one of the two
high-points of it all.
The second high point has to be at a cocktail party, when Brooks really lets
go with his signature ability to spool dialogue line on top of line, and
somehow keep it all at least peripherally pertinent. Every time you think
the back and forth is over, it's not, which is definitely his strength. It's
why everyone quotes Broadcast News. But The Muse isn't just about
underbreath conversation (though it does start slow and hushed, until Sarah
gets on-screen). As expected, it's a touch intellectual as well, even going
so far as to toy with the foundational myth-structure, or, to foreground
what's usually repressed in these divine-intervention mythic cycles: the
host/parasite dynamic. The way Sarah is at least as dependent upon Steven as
Steven is dependent upon her, which is something of a wry comment upon
religion, perhaps, or at least upon a culture always looking over its
shoulder to Greece. But quiet enough not to get in the way, too.
This is, after all, a movie about the moviemakers, or, the realization of a
screenplay about a screenwriter. It has to hold itself to a higher, more
self-conscious standard. Is it Skin Deep or Barton Fink, though, right?
Well, it has elements of both--even a surprise Coen-ish ending, minus the
John Goodman serial killer--but the laugh-a-minute pacing pushes it perhaps
a little more in John Ritter's direction, which isn't at all a bad thing.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
On one side, there's Satan himself, still trying to murder the world, and on
the other there's an unbeliever, who just happens to be the only one with
half a chance to save that world. We've seen the story again and again and
again, and the creators of End of Days had to be aware of this. So, they
improvised, first with timing, (millennium fears etc) second with big-name
stars, (Schwarzenegger, Byrne, Steiger), and third with attempting to co-opt
the religious thriller into the high-action genre, which--as one doesn't
require guns to save the day and the other does--doesn't work very well, or,
results in the hero, 'Jericho Cane,' (Schwarzenegger, yes) having to tell
the devil (Gabriel Byrne, in an evil Christopher Walkenish role) to 'go to
hell.' Not the most original line, but then fending off the apocalypse with
hot lead is hard work, and perhaps all the creative effort went into the old
testament pyrotechnics instead of the writing anyway.
Aside from all the divine firepower, though, End of Days does try to be
different in another way, by playing particularly fast and loose with
Revelations, biblical prophecy, all that, mixing it up until existence as we
know it depends upon the devil not jumping in the sack with one Christine
York (Robin Tunney). Most near-apocalyptic movies concern themselves either
with the birth or the rise of the Antichrist or some Antichrist-figure; End
of Days, instead of organizing itself around efforts to prevent that birth
and/or rise, concerns itself with preventing the initial conception. And of
course Christine York doesn't really want to play Vanessa Williams to
Schwarzenegger's Eraser, but neither does she want to have sex with the
devil. Which means that for most of the movie, they're two scant steps ahead
of perdition, running both from Satan and from the Catholic church. It makes
for some high-action, Terminator II kind of stuff, except now the T1000 is
supernatural. In all the other aspects, though, it matches up, even the end.
What End of Days has going for it finally is A) Byrne; B) Kevin Pollak and
his complement of "It's official: I'm never sleeping again" lines; and C)
Schwarzenegger, the original Commando, still playing the Conan we'd pay to
see again and again. What it doesn't have going for it is that for much of
the movie, Jericho thinks he's a burned-out Martin Riggs (Lethal Weapon),
complete with deathwish and all. Too, there's a lot of fumbling over the
whole problem of evil question, which is best left for other movies--say,
Dogma. It does actually have one strong line--about the greatest trick the
devil ever pulled--but perhaps Pollak or Byrne brought that with them from
The Usual Suspects, so it doesn't really count. Of the recent spate of
millennium movies, however, (discounting Entrapment) End of Days is, in
spite of its problems, still miles ahead of Omega Code, and even slightly
better than Stigmata, if only because, where Stigmata seemed to have
preaching on its agenda, all End of Days was after was entertainment, plain
and simple. Good old-fashioned noise and lights, the standard-issue patch
for weak writing. End of Days has nearly a patch a scene.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Title
Review for Omega Code, The (1999)
It is possible to counterbalance weak writing with high action, cool
effects, all that. Look at all the American Ninjas, Gymkatas, etc, which,
though admittedly lacking in story, are nevertheless fun to watch for all
the head kicks and double back flips. Or, take Fair Game, a shoddy movie
with very well-choreographed effects, which keeps us coming back to it again
and again. Or Starship Troopers, which, as we go it to solely for the space
bugs, tends to satisfy (i.e., has enough space bugs to go around). The
formula is simple: construct whatever story is minimally necessary to allow
all the cool effects. This is how porn works, after all, yes? It's about
anticipating your target audience's needs and then catering to that
audience. There's an implicit deal there, even, an understanding. Supply and
demand; exploitation.
As with any 'implicit' deal, however, there's room for misunderstanding, the
possibility that a movie will lure the target audience into the theatre only
to show them a different movie altogether. Regrettably, this is what Omega
Code does: instead of foregrounding all the high-action stuff as the trailer
suggests, it attempts to supplant it with a reckless amalgamation of all the
stories that 'should' work. Which is to say what it tries to make cool is
the story, when we're not there for the story. And then, to add insult to
betrayal, it's not even a good story at that. Or rather, it's a bad mix of,
say, the religious thriller aspects of Seventh Sign (Prophecy, Omen,
Stigmata, etc), the 'biblical code' intrigue of pi, and the 'ancient
gadgetry' of Stargate, with a load of shallow historical references thrown
in as afterthought (e.g., the bad guy is "Alexander," trying to conquer that
world).
It all centers around Dr. Lane (Casper Van Dien; Starship Troopers, yes),
motivational guru, world religion expert, Joseph Campbell wannabe. He's our
hero, strutting into every situation with the same unshakable confidence
Brandon Fraser had in the 1999 Mummy. As if he knows it's all just a movie.
Soon enough Lane hooks up with Stone Alexander (Michael York), and together
they remap the Middle East with not much more than platitude and gumption.
After a feat like that, the world's easy pickings. In a matter of scenes,
then, Alexander is crowned king of the new world order. Granted, the ease
with which he conquers the known world is nominally justified by the fact
that Alexander is clandestinely following his stolen Omega Code like a
script--simply fulfilling the history-of-things-to-come as it's spelled out
in numbers, in the Torah--but still, if simple foreknowledge were all that's
necessary, wouldn't (James Bond's) Spectre have figured that out long ago?
Essentially, Alexander comes to power the same way Biff from Back to the
Future 2 wanted to: by reading tomorrow's paper. And that's been done and
done and done.
To Omega Code's credit, however, it does fulfill a few genre expectations:
the bad guy does have a foreign accent and access to all the computers; the
good guy is having marital difficulties; all the women are stunningly
beautiful; Michael Ironside is a somebody's henchman. And, as for the Omega
Code itself, it's comfortably familiar, or, is something of a mix between
the Omega Molecule in Star Trek Voyager and the Genesis Effect in Star Trek:
The Wrath of Khan. All of which is to say there's nothing new in Omega Code,
even down to it's attempt to play on our Millennium fears. It does have a 12
Monkeys moment, though, with the fugitive turning from a cop car only to
find his face on wall of television sets, but that's hardly enough to save a
movie that feels like it was accidentally routed to the theatre, when it in
fact should have gone directly to video.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com/

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Most movies willingly yield to even minimal analysis--fall apart in your
hands, into a set of easily identifiable conventions, character types, etc.
Not so with director Sam Mendes' American Beauty, the story of what the
suburban American dream looks like minus the veneer, the 'image' of success
each of the characters is either violently reacting to or desperately trying
to adopt. First there's Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey, in his best role since
se7en, perhaps), a pathetic excuse for a father in his daughter Jane's
(Thora Birch) eyes, and--as the brief opening establish es--even pathetic
enough that she 'hires' her off-camera boyfriend to kill him. But this isn'
t To Die For. Next there's Carolyn Burnham (Annette Benning), Lester's
neurotic wife. She who says part of her job is to "live the image of
success." So we know what pole she's at. After her there's the love-interest
pair we all want to make it out alive: Jane and off-camera beau Ricky Fitts
(Wes Bentley), two fringe-dwellers intent on not buying into the
establishment their parents represent. In addition there's Ricky's
homophobic Marine-dad (Chris Cooper) and Jane's non-friend Angela (Mena
Suvari) the budding model, who individually manage to supply a large part of
the forward motion of American Beauty, which in turn allows the core
characters to develop in a less contrived manner, as they don't have to
carry everything at every moment.
The key word here is strong writing, even down to the management of Lester's
occasional narrative intrusions. Yes, voice-overs. For an audience well
aware that Ridley Scott's cut of Bladerunner was far better without it. As
if that wasn't enough, too, writer Alan Ball even goes one better, by having
Lester's narration be from the grave, pace Traces of Red, Carlito's Way.
Unlike those two, however, the dead (dying) narrator here isn't a gimmick,
but a subtle narrative device: Lester earns our trust (becomes reliable) via
telling us in advance how the story is going to go--that he dies at the end.
This both provides a little dramatic impetus to things (we want to know how,
why) and fosters the illusion that all his cards are on the table, which in
turn suggests either that his death isn't going to be the 'real' climax of
the movie or that everything else is going to be so exciting that his death
will, in comparison, be anticlimactic. That there will be no mystery there.
But then, surprise surprise, there is some mystery, and his death definitely
is the climax, and the writing was so smooth all along--the narrative
manipulation so deft--that there's no need for the kind of critical
reinterpretation that, say, Arlington Road or Sixth Sense called for. Not
that kind of ending, where the curtain's finally pulled all the way back and
you wonder how you missed what was really going on. More the kind of ending
where character and theme come together just long enough for you to feel
like you're seeing deeper into something. And, as this is a movie (i.e.,
'moving image') about an image-driven America, that something is of course
there in the title: America.
But then there's that second word, Beauty, which our camera eye Ricky Fitts
doesn't see in the typical places--say, Angela Hayes, where Lester
definitely does sees it--but in either the supra-mundane or in death, the
second of which comes to form part of the algebra of the movie: that there's
beauty in death, that beauty equals death. Which calls for a reevaluation of
the title, keeping in mind that Lester's told us he's going to be dying here
soon. In not so many words, that his death will be beautiful. And it is,
both because it visually justifies the recurrent red-rose conceit of the
movie and because his death is the final stage of his long-awakening. It's
the old the-more-awake-you-are-the-more-doomed-you-are trick, except this
time it's not dramatically tied into things (e.g., in a horror movie, the
first person to 'realize' gets whacked, etc). And his awakening is a
pleasure to watch, both because Spacey pulls it off with such comic elegance
and because it sets so many things in motion that A) it seems highly
unlikely that Alan Ball will be able to properly 'answer' each complication,
and B) it becomes difficult to assign more importance to one thing or
another, which is to say each development is very difficult to predict. That
is, everything looks so random and muddled that our kneejerk cinematic
expectations kick in and we instinctively pigeonhole American Beauty as one
of those self-conscious movies more intent upon making us laugh at our
denuded selves than upon telling a good story.
But then, in the final minutes, Ball both ties everything neatly together
and manages to make each development unpredictable yet, in retrospect,
absolutely necessary. And it's all done without ever getting too
serious--Ricky's military dad even has a Mr. Roper/Three's Company moment
which, while not quite in keeping with the tone of the rest of the movie, is
nevertheless in keeping with his paranoid conception of the world. In those
final minutes too, during a sex scene which is the culmination of Lester's
awakening, Sam Mendes quietly directs the camera at a tennis shoe--a child's
shoe, Angela's--which manages to sum up Lester's plight in a way that
dialogue really couldn't. Meaning that not only is American Beauty
intelligently written, but it's strongly directed, which is a rare
combination, allows American Beauty to become the movie that Ice Storm
wanted to be, that The Myth of Fingerprints had vague inclinations towards,
that American History X might have been. It's perhaps the strongest movie to
come around in a few years. Five stars. Out of five.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Here's the story: three-thousand odd years ago some Jafar-type priest /
sorcerer got caught romancing the pharaoh's wife. Pretty typical stuff, but
then the pharaoh turns out have gone to the same school as all the
Bond-nemeses, the one where they ask why kill the guy when there are so many
other imaginative ways to (not) get rid of him? To give the pharaoh some
credit, though, the idea is that the punishment must fit the crime, and the
crime here is measured by how fed up with all this the pharaoh is. As bad
luck would have it, too, he's seriously fed up, meaning the only punishment
that can assuage his anger is to have Imhotep (the Jafar-sorcerer; Arnold
Vosloo) granted immortality and then summarily entombed for 'eternity' with
some flesh-eating beetles. Of course, eternity only lasts about
three-thousand years, or, until French Foreign Legionnaire Rick O'Connell
(Brendan Fraser) stumbles upon the burial, Hamunaptra, fabled city of wealth
hid midst the shifting sands etc.
Too--and even though The Mummy's set in the early part of the 20th
century--O'Connell has evidently not only seen all of the Indiana Joneses,
but evidently committed them to memory, right down to proper attire. But he
doesn't awaken Imhotep quite yet. That's plot point 1, and anyway, there's
still some other characters to introduce, the most important of which is
Evelyn, (Rachel Weisz) the fumbling, supermodel librarian. Close behind is
her conniving brother Jonathan (John Hannah). Together they hire scrupleless
O'Connell to take them to this lost city, which, while not quite as
impressive as the Egypt of Stargate, is still pretty cool. Add to it a bevy
of special effects miles ahead of any other movie and everything's set up
for a walloping good time, the kind of ride the trailer promised.
And the mummy, wow. Gone are the days when his kind shuffled around with
rigor mortis of the arms and a confused expression. Now the mummy's
serious--fast, strong, gross, a definite improvement. He even has a voice,
of the same calibre as, say, Wishmaster's, which was some top-notch
low-bass. Unlike Wishmaster, however, The Mummy tries a little too hard to
have it all--action, humor, horror. It's as if director Stephen Sommers took
all the flashy elements from Indiana Jones and tripled their intensity, with
the intention of tripling the Indiana Jones effect. Which would have been
fine as concerns the action and the horror--you can never have enough of
them; they're what we're paying for here. But the humor, the zingers written
in practically every other line. With that kind of stuff, less tends to be
more, y'know? Best to use them as a John McClane might, in the Diehard
series. Or, perhaps, best to simply not write in a comic character for the
kids. Beni (Kevin J. O'Conner, a long way from his Swann-role), the mewling,
opportunistic (reluctant) side-kick of evil. He does have a couple of
honestly good lines, but they're hardly worth all his throwaway ones. If one
character can bring down a movie that otherwise has so much going fot it,
then Beni does. If one character can save that same movie, however, look to
the Encino Man himself, Brendan Fraser, fighting the mummy tooth and nail,
doing his best Harrison Ford, the kind where we know who the real immortal
is. Suffice it to say that if you were ever hungry enough for low-rent,
high-stakes relic hunting that you tuned into the young Indiana Jones
episodes, then The Mummy might be just light-hearted enough to satisfy.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
First there was Tron, the movie and the videogame. Next came The Last
Starfighter, where life was a videogame, more or less. Soon enough cyberpunk
reigned and Johnny Mnemonic was born into the neuroscape of virtual reality;
not long after, virtual reality gave birth itself, and Russell Crowe got to
play the 'perfect' killer in the aptly-named Virtuosity. But of course
people have been slipping between dimensions and realities and timeframes
and worlds since Rod Serling. However, nine times out of ten it's just a
gimmick, and any of that good old Twilight Zone paranoia ('is this really
real?') is scuttled in favor of effects. But now David Cronenberg is taking
a graphic stab at the whole thing, and he brings nothing to the table if not
a fundamental--and contagious--distrust of reality.
His eXistenZ is set either in some alternate world or the near future. For
purposes of the movie, it doesn't really matter. Suffice it to say that it's
a reality where a two-headed frog / salamander / lizard is a 'sign of the
times.' Too, everyone walks around with 'bioports,' little jacks in the
lower spine which get umbilically attached to gamepods, which are themselves
made of metaflesh and seem to have gender. And everyone's addicted to the
games these gamepods allow, to the point that society has become
factionalized over them, has split into the 'realists' and the
'antirealists.' The realists like to space out and play games; the
antirealists don't. eXistenZ is the story of their ongoing skirmish.
But of course, too, it's more: these 'games' you can jack into aren't just
Pac-Man or Galaga with fancy joysticks, but are indistinguishable from real
life. As one of the characters says, "You have to play to figure out why
you're playing," or even if you're playing. Add to that the fact that,
within the game, you can jack into another game--thus going deeper and
deeper--and pretty soon you wonder if where you started in the first place
was really real or not. This is what world-famed game-designer / artist
Allegra Geller (Jennifer Jason Leigh) and her impromptu bodyguard Ted (Jude
Law) have to deal with, claw their way out of, etc.
It all starts when someone sneaks a 'bio' gun into a video-game marketing
seminar and shoots Allegra with a human tooth. Sounds crazy yes, but then
you should see the gun (as this is Cronenberg, too, there's no shortage of
pistols pulled from strange places). So, on the run now, Allegra and Ted,
naturally, jack into the game--ostensibly to check it out, but really just
to give all the bad guys a chance to run them ragged in virtual reality.
It's pretty cool for awhile, and, to Cronenberg's credit as a writer,
everytime it begins to flatten out he ups the (regression-)ante just a
little more, either by having causality cross the reality-boundary (per Lost
Highway, which has a very similar, impenetrable logic) or having identities
shift, per Total Recall (or, more specifically, another Philip K. Dick
work--Maze of Death, which eXistenZ pretty much is). Or, talking 'straight'
movies, Fincher's The Game, another case where the main character's never
quite sure what's real. In The Game, however, Fincher eventually makes the
world safe again, by putting a stop to all the regression, reestablishing a
consensual baseline. Not so with eXistenZ. This is Cronenberg, after all.
Just because it only takes 97 minutes to wrap things up, don't be fooled
into thinking it's safe. In a movie where you can build a sidearm from
dinner scraps, everything's dangerous.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Mystery Men (1999)
The trailer didn't lie: Casanova Frankenstein (Geoffrey Rush) has captured
Captain Amazing (wholesome Greg Kinnear), leaving a superhero-sized void in
the skies of Champion City. Enter Mr Furious, the Bowler, the Shoveler, Blue
Raja & Co. (Ben Stiller, Janeane Garafalo, William H. Macy, and Hank Azaria)
to fill that void and save the city. All slapstick aside, this is Kinka
Usher's Mystery Men, a send-up of all the Supermans and Batmans and Spawns
and Phantoms which have been taking themselves too seriously for too long
now. Granted, The Mask dealt with the whole superhero shtick in a similarly
tongue-in-cheek manner, but it didn't go nearly as far as Mystery Men. Or,
it was comic, but its comedy was confined to the scenic level; the backbone
of the superhero movie was left intact (i.e., the target
audience--children--was conservatively not overshot).
Not so with Mystery Men.
Mystery Men does to the superhero movie what Rustler's Rhapsody did to the
western: reduces it to the level of ridiculousness while still retaining
that same mass appeal. Yes, it does still have all the flash and gadgetry of
the Batman series, but--and this is important--the standby notions of good
and evil have been called into question. And in a particularly clever
manner: the hero no longer fights evil just because s/he's good, but because
it's good publicity to fight evil. And good publicity translates immediately
into corporate sponsorship, endorsement opportunities, star treatment. But
it's not easy being a superhero, either. You have to worry about staying in
character, sticking to a theme, matching your gloves with your boots,
getting the right publicist, and--as in Captain Amazing's case which sets
things in motion--you have to worry especially about having an arch-nemesis
left to fight. Batman had The Joker, Superman had Lex Luthor, etc. As
Mystery Men opens, though, Champion City is pretty much free of
arch-villains; Captain Amazing has been a little too amazing for his own
good, evidently.
This is remedied soon enough, by him, even, which, once it all turns around
on him, leaves room for the wannabees to fumble around and save the day. And
this wannabee contingent is the one brilliant aspect of the movie, simply
because it's so logical: in a world where superheroes wear Pepsi armbands,
there will of course be hero-types a few rungs down, longing to wear that
armband as well, longing to save the city so as to get a little airtime. But
not every wannabee is a hero, either. Some are just grown men wearing tutus.
And some, like Mr Invisible, can only be invisible when no one's looking at
them.
And the villains are nearly as fantastic (disco gangs etc.), if a tad more
traditional: they seem to still want to take over the city just because
that's what villains do. Which is something of a weakness, in that their
motivations are no longer the inverse of the heroes' (commercially-oriented)
motivations, which is to say that the good guys and the bad guys no longer
counterbalance each other. Even in Rustler's Rhapsody there is at least that
balance. It lends a wholeness to the proceedings, a wholeness missing from
Mystery Men. It goes deeper, though. While the sub-arch-nemeses are equally
as theme-loyal etc as the heroes here, the arch-arch nemesis--Casanova
Frankenstein--is, aside from his wonderful name, wholly typical.
To return to Rustler's Rhapsody again, in it the villain achieves balance
with the hero by being equally eccentric-by hiring a good-guy gunman to be
his bad guy. Which is a fitting turnaround. Mystery Men has no such built-in
turnaround, but instead relies on the individual comic ability of its cast,
which, while significant, doesn't quite make up for careless writing. Too,
and not dealt with, at the end of the movie these Mystery Men are in the
same predicament Captain Amazing opened with: though they have airtime now,
they don't have anything to do with that airtime, as they've defeated the
one bad guy around. Not for long is the idea, though, right? Which, in spite
of itself, brings Mystery Men full circle, transforms it into yet another
comic-book superhero movie, albeit with more laughs than usual.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
In keeping with blockbusters like Titanic and Saving Private Ryan, The Green
Mile is a story told by a participant now in the golden years of life. Aside
from the dramatic frame, (weepy prologue, nostalgic epilogue . . .) this
set-up has two narrative functions: A) by making the story 'told,' i.e.
unreliable, it allows for the introduction of, say, supernatural events, on
the grounds that maybe they were just supernatural to the narrator, or maybe
that's just how he's remembering it (or maybe he's sophisticated enough to
use the supernatural as a device, etc.); and, B) by setting the action in
the past, the supernatural is once again 'normalized,' because the past is,
after all, where the magic has always happened. Look to the Old Testament as
compared to the New, or to primitive societies, where three generations back
there's always a mythical ancestor, a figure now legendary. In American
terms, these figures are the stuff of tall tales. Iron John, Paul Bunyon,
etc. And now Stephen King has given us another: John Coffey, (Michael
Duncan) a depression-era gentle giant both afraid of the dark and imbued
with the supernatural abilities Green Mile goes to such great lengths to get
us to accept.
Too, though--and unlike Dead Zone, Firestarter and the rest--the one with
the supernatural abilities here isn't the main character. Instead that falls
to prison guard Paul Edgecomb, (Tom Hanks, with yet another award-worthy
script) who's evidently never seen Murder in the First, doesn't know how
prison guards are supposed to have acted in the early part of the twentieth
century. Not only is he extraordinarily compassionate, but he's gathered
around him a crew of similarly kind guards. In fact, only one of them,
Percy, (Dough Hutchison) fits the stereotype, which allows the movie the
reversal of placing the real criminal on the wrong side of the bars. And,
when that's the case, then of course their sentences have to be meted out in
alternative manners, just to maintain some sense of justice.
Conversely, though, when the one behind the bars is in fact wrongly accused,
misunderstood, etc, as John Coffey obviously is, then similarly alternative
means have to be found to both permit his unearned punishment (voluntary
sacrifice is the usual tack) and do so in a dramatically acceptable way.
Which is no easy thing. Without King behind the pen, too, it likely would
have proved too difficult. Since he is there, though, the 'Green Mile' (E
block, death row) quickly becomes a closed little system, capable not only
of permitting John Coffey's punishment in an acceptable way, but requiring
it. Think Iron Giant; The Green Mile is simply an unanimated version. And
The Iron Giant was excellent. So is The Green Mile, even going so far as to
have John Coffey--the character too 'pure' for this world--be drawn as he
must to the idealized humanity presented in the movies. It's a very nice
touch, sets The Green Mile miles ahead of the other death-row dramas, (Dead
Man Walking, Last Dance, etc) and right up there with King's other
non-horror successes--Stand By Me, Shawshank Redemption. The Green Mile is
every bit as good.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Runaway Bride (1999)
Romantic comedy is largely about oppositions, and the eventual collapse of
those oppositions into a happy ending. Which suggests that those oppositions
weren't oppositions after all. In Gary Marhsall's Runaway Bride, Maggie
(Julia Roberts) and Ike (Richard Gere), are earmarked early on for such a
happy ending by how opposite they seem to be: city boy and country girl;
misogynist and man-eater; harried freelance journalist and sedentary 9-5
hardware store manager; etc. This is all established in about four minutes.
Underneath those tags, however, are two people who are both defined by their
manner when the clock's ticking down: Maggie walking down the aisle and Ike
with 15 minutes left to write a story.
Which is how Runaway Bride opens, with Maggie running and Ike getting a
second-hand version of her running and then writing it into his column.
Which is the initial complication that draws them together: Maggie disagrees
with Ike's write-up of her vehemently enough that he's 'assigned' to cover
her pending wedding. If she runs, he's vindicated; if she doesn't, he loses
this country girl he's falling for. It all gets a little complicated, which
is nice. What isn't so nice is that Ike's assignment feels a little
contrived, a little too functional. This is a direct result of there being
no sharp turning point into the country for him, but more of a gradual and
inevitable curve, shaped not by dramatic events but by the necessity of
reuniting Gere and Roberts on-screen for another Pretty Woman, a pressure
Pretty Woman alumn Gary Marshall must have been acutely aware of. It shows.
Since then and now though things have changed a bit, however. Most recently,
there's been My Best Friend's Wedding and Forces of Nature, both offering
non-traditional 'comedic' endings which skew our expectations a bit as
concerns wedding-movies, both of them suggesting that the happiest ending
isn't always the one we want to be the happy ending. Runaway Bride could
have used this to its advantage, but it chooses not to. Instead it relies a
bit desperately on Gere and Roberts to turn mediocre writing into magic.
Granted, Joan Cusack is wonderful in her habitual sidekick role, adding
humor and a little tenderness to the proceedings, but in the final analysis
it's Gere and Roberts. There's simply no room for anyone else, not even
Maggie's current betrothed, Coach Bob.
And Coach Bob even seems aware of this in his military-athletic way, bowing
gracefully out for Ike. And again, it's a little bit of a set-up, but at
least this time it's supported by convention, by the need for comedic
reversal: Maggie, habitually running away from men she's attracted to, will
instinctively cling to the one she's repulsed by. She has to. The genre
demands it. Similarly, Ike has to be the groom that no other groom was for
Maggie, do what none of the others did: chase her, literally or
figuratively. Like the boy who brought the king water in Fisher King. In
Runaway Bride's favor, however, there is at least the suggestion of a larger
narrative functioning, a little tension over whether Maggie will become part
of Ike's story (another sacrifice to the dailies) or whether he'll become
part of hers (another groom left with a lot of cake left to eat alone),
which, in a Gere/Roberts movie not predicated on a Roy Orbison ditty, is
finally all we have to cling to.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Minus Man, The (1999)
Movies about serial killers are typically from some detective's POV as he
and we try to figure out just who the serial killer is. Why is it like this?
Simply because if the audience isn't seduced into some sort of sympathetic
relationship with the ostensible main character of the movie, that movie
doesn't work. We've got to care about the main character, not want him or
her to die. And, if the main character were the serial killer, well, it
would be that much harder to make him or her sympathetic. So most take the
conservative way out, allow the killer to be the focus of things, but make
the sympathetic detective the main character, the one we can feel
comfortable identifying with. Hampton Fancher's The Minus Man turns this all
around, makes the serial killer the main character. Which isn't all that
new, really, but, instead of establishing some sort of hierarchy of
immorality whereby the killer is serving some vigilante conception of
justice (Slingblade), Fancher makes his serial killer just as random and
heartless as Early Quaid from Kalifornia, or, better yet, Henry, from
Portrait of a Serial Killer.
His name is Vann Siegert. He drifts around in a phantom-grey 1979 F-250. And
he kills people (in a low-budget way), and he's done it enough that he even
has self-imposed rules, and he's played by none other than Owen Wilson (in a
Bottletrocket-ish role), ingratiating himself at every turn with his
I'm-showing-all-my-teeth-Mom smiles, his wide range of shy shoulder shrugs,
and a childlike diction which supplies a lot of the dry humor of The Minus
Man ('If Doug did something bad to his wife, he sure picked a bad time').
None of this is kept from us, either. From the opening frames, when he does
away with the down-and-out Caspar (Sheryl Crow, debuting), we know that Vann
Siegert's our Minus Man here. What we don't know is why, and Fancher uses
this generated need for explanation to pull us through the rest of the
movie. It's a device, yes, one most often used when the middle parts are
going to directionless enough that direction has to come from elsewhere. To
look at it another way, the idea is that if we want the answer badly enough,
we'll sit through anything to get it.
But then anything stretches two artfilm hours, which is to say clever
dialogue mismatched with an overly deliberate pace. Or perhaps perfectly
matched, imperfectly conceived. Either way, it drags at times, though of
course there's the necessary developments: the unsuspecting potential victim
Ferrin (Janeane Garofalo), a postal co-worker/love-interest, the
escalation/rising suspicion which results from too many bodies suddenly
turning up, the injustice of killing those who don't really deserve to
die--all the usual serial killer stuff.
What's strong about The Minus Man, though, is that there's more.
Specifically, there's serial killer Vann Siegert having bad enough luck to
rent a room from the most deranged family in town. And he's supposed to be
the deranged one here. As it works out, though, he quickly becomes something
of a replacement for the family's missing daughter, and subsequently finds
himself doing everything he can to keep that family sane. All the while of
course leading his double life--killing people on the side with zero
remorse, no passion. In fact, his 'killings' and the running monologue he
keeps about his bad habit suggest that he either sees himself as some
impersonal force of nature or wants to be that impersonal force of nature.
Which is as close as we ever get to any explanation. So be it.
Vann Siegert doesn't just talk to himself about it, though, either. As in
Chasing Amy, he has a couple of imaginary friends to bounce ideas off of.
But these imaginary friends, they're something of a cross between a David
Lynchian 'projected guilt' trick and the little kid who beat up Keifer
Sutherland in Flatliners. Meaning they 'bounce' ideas off him. Dwight Yoakum
and Dennis Haysbert, FBI agents extrordinaire, who together comprise about
2/3rds of the law in The Minus Man. The other third is a real state trooper,
whose presence allows an equally real Clay Pigeons type ending, which is the
only intense scene in the whole movie. Better late than never, right? When
all else fails, do what's been done. Fancher does, and it works, but just
barely.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Stigmata was marketed as horror, when it's not. It's a religious thriller.
There is a difference. Whereas (good) horror startles and disturbs you, the
religious thriller unseats you, unsettles you. Doesn't make you leave the
light on. Think Omen, Exorcist, not Prophecy. All the same though, Stigmata
is a bit more upbeat than Omen or Exorcist, which translates into less
unsettling (more reassuring). But the dramatics are all there.
It opens with Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne), the Vatican's
miracle-debunker, doing his job in Brazil. And of course he stumbles onto
the real thing. And of course no one believes him. Cut to Philadelphia,
where a certain Brazilian artifact has found Frankie Paige (Patricia
Arquette), who, as the trailer's already told us, starts manifesting
stigmata. Kiernan comes to investigate, which involves the mandatory initial
doubting session followed soon enough by eventual conversion. All of this is
typical, right down to Kiernan, the scientist who's a preacher who's a
scientist who's Damian Karras, Doubting Thomas etc.
What isn't typical, though, is legion. First, there's the Romeo + Juliet-ish
camera/editing work, which lends an MTV quality to everything-fast-paced,
high-decibel, undeniable. Second, there's something like a social
indictment/imperative buried in all the techno-distraction: that the church
has become more important than religion. Third, there's no choir-singing
whatsoever, which is odd in a movie so consciously derivative that it hides
secrets in photographs (qua Omen), pancakes make-up on its Linda Blair
character, has doves exploding into the sky left and right, all that.
It does work, though, for about three-quarters of its runtime (before Rome
comes to Philadelphia, with no brotherly love). Especially effective are the
lengths writer Tom Lazarus goes to to establish that Frankie is definitely
not worthy of the stigmata, so something else must be going on. Something
is, as Kiernan--the ex-communicated detective of Stigmata--slowly finds out.
And it's more or less the same story as The Name of the Rose, or, more
recently, pi: there exists somewhere out there a lost book (in pi, number)
which can change the world. Meaning the people who are happy with the world
as it is don't want that book being discovered.
Effective also is the structuring of Stigmata. Like Se7en, which is
structured around the seven deadly sins, Stigmata is structured around the
five wounds of Jesus Christ during crucifixion, only here each wound ups the
ante via pushing Frankie that much closer to death, meaning she's a victim
in need of saving. Not quite as effective is Kiernan's occasional ignorance,
when he asks obvious questions for us about the gospels and such, which is
supposed to function as narrative exposition but instead makes his character
a little less believable each time. Too--and even though a token explanation
is offered--there seems to be no reason for Frankie to talk in demon-voices,
tell you lies, fake flames, etc. Or, the only viable explanation isn't
within the story but in what we expect: the creepy dissonance of Patricia
Arquette talking with a male voice. It is unsettling, it just doesn't quite
fit in a movie that tries to be so loyal to the academic side of things.
Twice as unsettling as the demon-voices, though, is an early shot of a woman
and baby and a lot of traffic, which is where Stigmata is strongest: in
director Rupert Wainwright's meticulously composed audio-visual moment, when
he's got all the religious iconography standing small yet important against
a modern backdrop. It doesn't quite make us want to go to church as Omen
did, or leave us feeling dirty as Exorcist did, but all the same, Stigmata
does leave us with questions, which at least feel a lot like doubts, which
is what the religious thriller uses to unsettle us. Even the religious
thrillers with MTV appeal.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Jakob the Liar (1999)
In a Holocaust movie the question is never Is the hammer going to
fall, but When is the hammer going to fall. And who's going to live
through razing the ghetto. Who's going on the train. Before we even
sit down to Jakob the Liar, we already expect these questions to be
answered. It's not all about convention, however: we also expect to
appreciate dignity, perseverance, humility, sacrifice, the whole gamut
of things that made us cry at Schindler's List. And of course, as a
bonus, we get to hate the Nazis some more. The Holocaust movie is one
of the last remaining places where good and evil can be so clearly
demarcated without compromising the integrity of things, one of the
last settings where a black hat unequivocally means 'bad,' a white,
'good.'
In Jakob the Liar, Jakob Heym (Robin Williams)--self-proclaimed
part-time Jew--wears the whitest hat of all. As for story arc, too,
it's a lot like Braveheart, just without all the epic
patriotism. Patriotism is, after all, land-related, and the Jewish
community of Jakob the Liar is by definition landless. But still,
Jakob does more or less organize the resistance, his wife is already
dead (Fisher King?), and there is a torture scene towards the
end. And, people are affecting accents off an on, though it never gets
so careless as Costner's Robin Hood.
It all starts rather thematically, per Forrest Gump, with a
simpled-down man and something floating on the wind. In Jakob the
Liar, it's a newspaper. And Jakob's chasing it, shadow-playing things
to come: how one errant word from him will snowball out of control,
thrust this pancake vendor into the role of a prophet, in a time when
prophet is defined as he-who-has-news of the war. The thing is,
though--as Jakob chasing the newspaper establishes--Jakob doesn't have
the news. His 'radio' is a desperate figment of a collective
imagination. Which is where the Liar part comes into play. Accurate or
make-believe, news for the Jewish community engenders hope, and hope
is rare. So, by piling lie on lie, each more fantastic than the last,
Jakob can keep his (all-star) community afloat awhile longer.
But of course making light of a bad situation can only last so long.
In spite of the welcome humor and Fiddler on the Roof music, this is a
Holocaust movie. Sombre is a word. Inevitable's another. The first
spoken word, is, after all, "Hitler," and every exchange after is,
though often comical, nevertheless weighted, simply by the fact that
this parting could be the last parting. What's particularly effective
with all this, too, is how director/writer Peter Kassovitz subtly
manages to put us in the same position as the Jewish community, via
cleverly keeping the timeline from us, which serves to nullify the
dramatic irony that would have otherwise been operant. In spite of the
history lessons complete with dates, we, like the Jews, have no idea
when this is all going to be over. Meaning that for some tense moments
at the end Jakob the Liar sways between tragedy and comedy, and
doesn't commit itself either way until the closing frames, and even
then--as with The French Lieutenant's Woman--it tries to get the best
of both worlds, both endings. Because it's Robin Williams, too, it
does.
for more like this, check out http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Heavy Metal shocked us by having nude, animated people frolic on-screen, (as
did Fantastic Planet, etc) which is to say it was a cartoon for grown-ups.
Or, to look at it another way, the cartoon grew up with its initial
audience, that is, the audience grew up to make their own cartoon. But, in
spite of the casual drug use and the graphically-inked skin, Heavy Metal was
still pretty simple. Next, enter Japanimation, an artform unto itself,
which, with feature-length movies like Grave of the Fireflies and Akira,
introduced some much-needed narrative complexity into these 'cartoons,'
which, in spite of Disney's singalong efforts, were quickly becoming a
viable medium for presenting meaningful stories. The trailer for Happiness,
after all--a, somber, 'serious,' adult movie if there ever was one--was
animated. And what are The Simpsons about if not a level of social critique
most children aren't really interested in? In light of all this, it would
seem that Trey Parker and Matt Stone's South Park: Bigger, Longer & Uncut,
with its host of musical numbers, poor animation, and profanity that might
make Richard Pryor blush--not to mention its 'fad' status and T-shirt
sales--would be something of a throwback, atavistic by current anime
standards. In spite of itself, though, it's not.
It actually has quite a complex little rhetoric smuggled in under all the
self-effacement. The story is simple: the South Park gang we know and love
from Comedy Central manages to sneak into an R-rated movie, which instantly
corrupts their vocabulary, which in turn attracts the ire of the
PTA-contingent, who directs their collective anger at the Canadian
moviemakers, which--as everything escalates at light speed (i.e., faster
than logic)--results soon enough in America declaring war on Canada (and
nearly allows Satan and Sadam Hussein to take over the world, which 'dead'
Kenny gleans on his tour through Hell, but that's another story). All of
which serves to show not how important the profanity in the movie (Asses of
Fire) actually is, but how important we can make it, should we choose. And
of course it's all self-reflexive, which is where the complexity comes into
play: the movie-in-the movie--Asses of Fire--is a hardly-veiled version of
South Park (Bigger, Longer, & Uncut), which in turn suggests that when all
the profanity begins to offend us, as it's programmed to, we can either get
riled in the manner of South Park's PTA-contingent or simply sit back, let
the profanity etc wash over us.
Granted, at some level this is the same choice you have with any 'offensive'
movie, but South Park takes it one step further: by drawing the
PTA-contingent as so comically misdirected and hypocritical, their response
is thus pre-coded for us as 'wrong,' ridiculous, overblown. Meaning it
anticipates our eventual criticism and deconstructs it, leaves us no real
choice but to sit back and try to enjoy. Of course the oft-cited problem
with this metafictional approach is that, since the work is responding
solely to itself, it's solipsistic, onanistic--so self-involved as to be
void of any meaning, where meaning is defined as 'having some objective
correlation to the world.' The thing is, though, in spite of its narrative
self-involvement, the caricatures South Park draws, however harsh, are
nevertheless accurate. If you can't appreciate that, then look around, you
may just be on the PTA side of the river.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones, http://www.cinemuck.com

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
In Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery, set in the 90s, Austin's
arch-nemesis Dr. Evil is laughably stuck in the 60s, demanding a million
dollars to ransom the world, etc. Now it's the second installment, though,
and, to keep it interesting, Mike Myers has turned it all around: back in
his own time--the 60s--Dr. Evil is now laughably stuck in the 90s. Meaning
he now wants to ransom the world for a billion or so dollars, which is just
as preposterous as his 90s ransom demand. Which is precisely what Austin
Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me is all about: temporal dislocation. It's why
we love (or hate) Austin--via some fantastic cryogenics, he's managed to
preserve a 60's mindset wholly unsullied by the 70s and 80s. But, to return
to the little binary set that propels both movies (Dr. Evil/Austin Powers),
while this childlike quality is light-hearted and attractive in Austin, in
Dr. Evil it's a character flaw. Granted, a lighthearted, entertaining one,
but still, more or less the reason Austin defeats him in International Man
of Mystery.
The Spy Who Shagged Me isn't quite so balanced. This time the binary set of
Austin/Evil falls apart a bit, with Dr. Evil more or less taking the lead
role, leaving Austin and Agent Shagwell (Heather Graham) to their series of
hijinks etc. Perhaps this is a result of the introduction of Fat Bastard
(Mike Myers again), Dr. Evil's lackey, or perhaps Evil's Mini-Me skewed
everything somehow. Whatever the case, with Austin and Evil no longer
counterbalancing each other narratively, the mojo that propelled us through
the first installment is somewhat diluted, and all we have to pull us
through then is the slapstick, the self-conscious intertextuality, the
in-jokes.
But there is plenty of all three.
Maybe even too much. Granted, Dr. Evils' Puff-Daddy intermezzo is one of the
highlights of the movie, something we can cue into, and there's Austin
mistaking a stool-sample for coffee, even Agent Shagwell pulling an Austin
from International Man of Mystery (sleeping with the enemy), but it doesn't
all cohere. Instead of going constantly forward as a 'fantastic' comedy
absolutely needs to, The Spy Who Shagged Me sidesteps again and again into
un-plot-related SNL-ish sketches. Dr. Evil's Puff-Daddy intermezzo is a case
in point. But , again, these sketches are entertaining (especially Will
Ferrel's Monty Python take-off), they just make The Spy Who Shagged Me a
fundamentally different type of movie than International Man of Mystery,
which used the sketches as plot devices.
In spite of these narrative difficulties, however, The Spy Who Shagged Me
does redeem itself, both with the frame it sets itself in (Jerry Springer
episodes) and with a wonderful little device it uses never to say 'penis'
when 'penis' really needs to be said. Just as in the closing scene of
International Man of Mystery the naked Austin and Vanessa Kensington's
(Elizabeth Hurley) R-rated parts are always hidden at the last possible
moment, so in The Spy Who Shagged Me--via wordplay, editing, and cameos
(Woody, Willie, etc)--'penis' is never said in the proper context, though
it's what everyone's talking about. This is Austin Powers, after all, and,
while we may not expect narrative rigor, we can can count on extended
joke-sequences such as these, handled with that signature Mike Myers touch.
(c) 1999 Stephen Graham Jones
for more like this, check out http://ww.cinemuck.com
